MASTER WILLIE. 

THERE was once a liltle boy called Willie. I 
never knew his other name, and as he lived 
far off behind the mountain, we cannot go to inquire. 
He had fair hair and blue eyes, and there was some- 
thing in his face that, when you had looked at him, 
made you feel quite happy and rested, and think 
of all the things you meant to do by-and-by when 
you were wiser and stronger. He lived all alone 
with the tall aunt, who was very rich, in the big 
house at the end of the village. Every morning he 
went down the street with his little goat under his 
arm, and the village folk looked after him and 
said, " There goes Master Willie." 

The tall aunt had a very long neck ; on the top of 
it was her head, on the top of her head she wore a 
white cap. Willie used often to look up at her and 
think that the cap was like snow upon the mountain. 
She was very fond of Willie, but she had lived a 
great many years and was always sitting still to think 
them over, and she had forgotten all the games she 
used to know, all the stories she had read 
when she was little, and when Willie asked her 
about them, would say, " No, dear, no, I can't 



MASTER WILLIE. 



remember ; go to the woods and play." Sometimes 
she would take his face between her two hands and 
look at him well while Willie felt quite sure that she 
was not thinking of him, but of someone else he did 
not know, and then she would kiss him, and turn 
away quickly, saying, " Go to the woods, dear ; it 
is no good staying with an old woman." Then he, 
knowing that she wanted to be alone, would pick 
up his goat and hurry away. 

He had had a dear little sister, called Apple- 
blossom, but a strange thing had happened to her. 
One day she over-wound her very big doll that 
talked and walked, and the consequence was quite 
terrible. No sooner was the winding-up key out 
of the doll's side than it blinked its eyes, talked 
very fast, made faces, took Apple-blossom by the 
hand, saying, " I am not your doll any longer, but you 
are my little girl," and led her right away no one 
could tell whither, and no one was able to follow. 
The tall aunt and Willie only knew that she had 
gone to be the doll's little girl in some strange 
place, where dolls were stronger and more 
important than human beings. 

After Apple-blossom left him, Willie had only his 
goat to play with ; it was a poor little thing with no 
horns, no tail and hardly any hair, but still he 
loved it dearly, and put it under his arm every 
morning while he went along the street. 

"It is only made of painted wood and a little hair, Master Willie," said the blacksmith's wife one 
day. " Why should you care for it ; it is not even 
alive." 

" But if it were alive, anyone could love it." 
"And living hands made it," the miller's wife 
said. " I wonder what strange hands they were; 
take care of it for the sake of them, little master." 

" Yes, dame, I will," he answered gratefully, and 
he went on his way thinking of the hands, wonder- 
ing what tasks had been set them to do since they 
fashioned the little goat. He stayed all day in the 
woods helping the children to gather nuts and 
blackberries. In the afternoon he watched them 
go home with their aprons full; he looked after 
them longingly as they went on their way singing. 
If he had had a father and mother, or brothers 
and sisters, to whom he could have carried home 
nuts and blackberries, how merry he would have 
been. Sometimes he told* the children how happy 
they were to live in a cottage with the door open all 
day, and the sweet breeze blowing in, and the cocks 
and hens strutting about outside, and the pigs 
grunting in the styes at the end of the garden ; to 
see the mother scrubbing and washing, to know 
that the father was working in the fields, and to 
run about and help and play, and be cuffed and 
kissed, just as it happened. Then they would 
answer, " But you have the tall lady for your aunt, 
and the big house to live in, and the grand carriage 



MASTER WILLIE. 



to drive in, while we are poor, and sometimes have 
little to eat and drink ; mother often tells us how 
fine it must be to be you." 

" But the food that you eat is sweet because you 
are very hungry," he answered them, " and no one 
sorrows in your house. As for the grand carriage, 
it is better to have a carriage if your heart is 
heavy, but when it is light, then you can run swiftly 
on your own two legs." Ah, poor Willie, how lonely 
he was, and yet the tall aunt loved him dearly. 
On hot drowsy days he had many a good sleep with 
his head resting against her high thin shoulders, 
and her arms about him. 

One afternoon, clasping his goat as usual, he 
sat down by the pond. All the children had gone 
home, so he was quite alone, but he was glad to 
look at the pond and think. There were so many 
strange things in the world, it seemed as if he 
would never have done thinking about them, not if 
he lived to be a hundred. 

He rested his elbows on his knees and sat 
staring at the pond. Overhead the trees 
were whispering ; behind him, in and out of 
their holes the rabbits whisked; far off he could 
hear the twitter of a swallow ; the foxglove was 
dead, the bracken was turning brown, the cones 
from the fir trees were lying on the ground. 
As he watched, a strange thing happened. Slowly 
and slowly the pond lengthened out and out, 



MASTER WILLIE. 13 



stretching away and away until it became a river 
a long river that went on and on, right down 
the woods, past the great black firs, past the little 
cottage that was a ruin and only lived in now and 
then by a stray gipsy or a tired tramp, past the 
setting sun, till it dipped into space beyond. 
Then many little boats came sailing towards 
Willie, and one stopped quite close to where 
he sat, just as if it were waiting for him. He 
looked at it well ; it had a snow-white sail and 
a little man with a drawn-sword for a figure- 
head. A voice that seemed to come from nowhere 
asked 

" Are you ready, Willie ? " Just as if he under- 
stood he answered back 

" Not yet, not quite, dear Queen, but I shall be 
soon. I should like to wait a little longer." 

" No, no, come now, dear child ; they are all 
waiting for you." So he got up and stepped into 
the boat, and it put out before he had even time to 
sit down. He looked at the rushes as the boat cut 
its way through them ; he saw the hearts of the 
lilies as they lay spread open on their great wide 
leaves ; he went on and on beneath the crimson 
sky towards the setting sun, until he slipped into ( 
space with the river. 

He saw land at last far on a-head, and as he 
drew near it he understood whither the boat was 
bound. All along the shore there were hundreds 



14 MASTER WILLIE. 



and hundreds of dolls crowding down to the 
water's edge, looking as if they had expected 
him. They stared at him with their shining 
round eyes ; but he just clasped his little goat 
tighter and closer, and sailed on nearer and nearer 
to the land. The dolls did not move ; they stood 
still, smiling at him with their painted lips, then 
suddenly they opened their painted mouths and 
put out their painted tongues at him ; but still he 
was not afraid. He clasped the goat yet a little 
closer, and called out, "Apple-blossom, I am 
waiting ; are you here ? " Just as he had expected, 
he heard Apple-blossom's voice answering from 
the back of the toy-town 

"Yes, dear brother, I am coming." So he 
drew close to the shore, and waited for her. He 
saw her a long way off, and waved his hand. 

" I have come to fetch you," he said. 

" But I cannot go with you unless I am bought," 
she answered, sadly, " for now there is a wire spring 
inside me ; and look at my arms, dear brother ;' ; 
and pulling up her pink muslin sleeves, she showed 
him that they were stuffed with sawdust. " Go 
home, and bring the money to pay for me," she 
cried, "and then I can come home again." But 
the dolls had crowded up behind, so that he might 
not turn his boat round. " Straight on," cried 
Apple-blossom, in despair ; " what does it matter 
whether you go backwards or forwards if you only 



MASTER WILLIE. 



keep straight when you live in a world that is 
round ? " 

So he sailed on once more beneath the sky that 
was getting grey, through all the shadows that 
gathered round, beneath the pale moon, and the 
little stars that came out one by one and watched 
him from the sky. 

I saw him coming towards the land of story- 
books. That was how I knew about him, dear 
children. He was very tired and had fallen asleep, 
but the boat stopped quite naturally, as if it knew 
that I had been waiting for him. I stooped, and 
kissed his eyes, and looked at his little pale face, 
and lifting him softly in my arms, put him into this 
book to rest. That is how he came to be here for 
you to know. But in the toy-land Apple-blossom 
waits with the wire spring in her breast and the 
sawdust in her limbs ; and at home, in the big 
house at the end of the village, the tall aunt 
weeps and wails and wonders if she will ever see 
again the children she loves so well. 

She will not wait very long, dear children. I 
know how it will all be. When it is quite dark to- 
night, and she is sitting in the leather chair with the 
high back, her head on one side, and her poor long 
neck aching, quite suddenly she will hear two voices 
shouting for joy. She will start up and listen, 
wondering how long she has been sleeping, and 
then she will call out 



1 6 MASTER WILLIE. 



"Oh, my darlings, is it you?" And they will 
answer back 

"Yes, it is us, we have come, we have come !" and 
before her will stand Willie and Apple-blossom. For 
the big doll will have run down, and the wire spring 
and the sawdust will have vanished, and Apple- 
blossom will be the doll's little girl no more. Then 
the tall aunt will look at them both and kiss them ; 
and she will kiss the poor little goat too, wondering 
if it is possible to buy him a new tail. But though 
she will say little, her heart will sing for joy. Ah, 
children, there is no song that is sung by bird or 
bee, or that ever burst from the happiest lips, that 
is half so sweet as the song we sometimes sing in 
our hearts a song that is learnt by love, and sang 
only to those who love us. 



SWINGING. 



SWING, swing, swing, 
Through the drowsy afternoon ; 
Swing, swing, swing, 

Up I go to meet the moon. 
Swing, swing, swing, 

I can see as I go high 
Far along the crimson sky ; 

I can see as I come down 

The tops of houses in the town ; 

High and low, 

Fast and slow, 

Swing, swing, swing. 



Swing, swing, swing, 

See ! the sun is gone away ; 
Swing, swing, swing, 

Gone to make a bright new day. 
Swing, swing, swing. 

I can see as up I go 

The poplars waving to and fro, 

I can see as I come down 

The lights are twinkling in the town, 

High and low, 

Fast and slow, 

Swing, swing, swing. 
2 



IS 



THE WOODEN DOLL. 

THE wooden doll had no peace. My dears, if 
ever you are a doll, hope to be a rag doll, or 
a wax doll, or a doll full of sawdust apt to ooze out, 
or a china doll easy to breakanything in the world 
rather than a good strong wooden doll with a 
painted head and movable joints, for that is indeed 
a sad thing to be. Many a time the poor wooden 
doll wished it were a tin train, or a box of soldiers, 
or a woolly lamb, or anything on earth rather than 
what it was. It never had any peace ; it was taken 
up and put down at all manners of odd moments, 
made to go to bed when the children went to bed, 
to get up when they got up, be bathed when they 
were bathed, dressed when they were dressed, 
taken out in all weathers, stuffed into their satchels 
when they went to school, left about in corners, 
dropped on stairs, forgotten, neglected, bumped, 
banged, broken, glued together, anything and 
everything it suffered, until many a time it said 
sadly enough to its poor little self, " I might as well 
be a human being at once and be done with it !" 
And then it fell to thinking about human beings ; 
what strange creatures they were, always going 
about, though none carried them save when they 
were very little ; always sleeping and waking, and 



THE WOODEN DOLL. 19 



eating and di inking, and laughing and crying, and 
talking and walking, and doing this and that and 
the other, never resting for long together, or seem- 
ing as if they could be still for even a single day. 
" They are always making a noise," thought the 
wooden doll ; " they are always talking and 
walking about, always moving things and doing 
things, building up and pulling down, and making 
and unmaking for ever and for ever, and never are 
they quiet. It is lucky that we are not all human 
beings, or the world would be worn out in no time, 
and there would not be a corner left in which to 
rest a poor doll's head." 



WATCHING. 

DEAR father's ship is very near, 
We'll blow him kisses, baby dear,- 
He may come home to-day. 
A happy wind that journeys south 
Seems just to linger round my mouth, 
Then bear a kiss away. 

Come, baby, I will hold you so, 
We'll watch the waves that outward go, 

And call, " Come back to-day ! " 
For father's heart seems always near, 
And who can tell but he may hear, 

Or know the words we say? 

All round and up the cottage wall 
The honeysuckle's grown so tall, 

It sees above the gate ; 
The flowers came hurrying up so sweet 
We told the little seeds they'd meet 

Dear father, and they wait. 

We first shall see a speck of white, 

Far, far away, there where the light 

Has swept the morning dim ; 



WA TCHING. 



So silent will his coming seem, 
'Twill be like waking from a dream 
To wave our hands to him. 

And then, and then he'll hoist you high, 
And swiftly pass the people by, 

Just stopping here and there 
To shake the neighbours by the hand, 
And tell them of the southern land, 

And ask them how they fare. 

He is not very far away, 

For mother said he'd come to-day 

We knew it by her face ; 
She caught you up and kissed you so, 
And now she's busy to and fro, 

And sings about the place. 



THE LIGHT ON THE HILLS. 

" T WANT to work at my picture," he said, and 

JL went into the field. The little sister went 
too, and stood by him watching while he painted. 

" The trees are not quite straight," she said, 
presently, "and oh, dear brother, the sky is not blue 
enough." 

"It- will all come right soon," he answered. 
"Will it be of any good ?" 

" Oh yes," she said, wondering that he should 
even ask, " it will make people happy to look at it. 
They will feel as if they were in the field." 

" If I do it badly, will it make them unhappy?" 

" Not if you do your very best," she answered ; 
"for they will know how hard you have tried. Look 
up," she said suddenly, "look up at the light upon 
the hills," and they stood together looking at all 
he was trying to paint, at the trees and the field, 
at the deep shadows and the hills beyond, and 
the light that rested upon them. 

" It is a beautiful world," the girl said. " It is a 
great honour to make things for it." 

" It is a beautiful world," the boy echoed sadly. 
" It is a sin to disgrace it with things that are 
badly done." 

" But you will do things well ?" 



THE LIGHT ON THE HILLS. 23 



"I get so tired," he said, "and long to leave off 
so much. What do you do when you want to do 
your best, your very, very best?" he asked, 
suddenly. 

" I think that I am doing it for the people I 
love," she answered. " It makes you very strong 
if you think of them ; you can bear pain, and walk 
far, and do all manner of things, and you don't get 
tired so soon." 

He thought for a moment. " Then I shall paint 
my picture for you," he said ; " I shall think of you 
all the time I am doing it." 

Once more they looked at the hills that seemed 
to rise up out of the deep shadows into the light, 
and then together they went home. 

Soon afterwards a great sorrow came to the boy. 
While the little sister slept, she wandered into 
another world, and journeyed on so far that she lost 
the clue to earth, and came back no more. The 
boy painted many pictures before he saw the field 
again, but in the long hours, as he sat and worked, 
there came to him a strange power that answered 
more and more truly to the longing in his heart 
the longing to put into the world something of 
which he was not ashamed, something which should 
make it, if only in the person of its meanest, 
humblest citizen, a little happier or better. 

At last, when he knew that his eye was true and 
his touch sure, he took up the picture he had 



24 THE LIGHT ON THE HILLS. 



promised to paint for the dear sister, and worked 
at it until he was finished. 

"This is better than all he has done before," the 
beholders said. "It is surely beautiful, for it makes 
one happy to look at it." 

"And yet my heart ached as I did it," the boy 
said, as he went back to the field. " I thought of 
her all the time I worked, it was sorrow that gave 
me power." It seemed as if a soft voice, that spoke 
only to his heart, answered back 

" Not sorrow but love, and perfect love has all 
things in its gift, and of it are all things born save 
happiness, and though that may be born too " 

" How does one find happiness ? " interrupted 
the boy. 

" It is a strange chase," the answer seemed to 
be ; "to find it for one's own self, one must seek it 
for others. We all throw the ball for each other." 

" But it is so difficult to seize." 

"Perfect love helps one to live without happi- 
ness," his own heart answered to himself ; " and 
above all things it helps one to work and to wait." 

"But if it gives one happiness too?" he asked 
eagerly. 

"Ah, then it is called Heaven. 1 ' 



WRITING A BOOK. 

" T ET us write a book," they said ; " but what 

-L' shall it be about ? " 

"A faiiy story," said the elder sister. 

" A book about kings and queens," said the 
other. 

" Oh, no," said the brother, " let's write about 
animals." 

"We- will write about them all," they cried 
together. So they put the paper, and pens, and 
ink ready. The elder sister took up a fairy story 
and looked at it, and put it down again. 

"I have never known any fairies," she said, 
" except in books ; but, of course, it would not do 
to put one book inside another anyone could do 
that." 

" I shall not begin to-day," the little one said, 
" for I must know a few kings and queens before I 
write about them, or I may say something foolish." 

" I shall write about the pig, and the pony, and 
the white rabbit," said the brother ; " but first I 
must think a bit. It would never do to write a 
book without thinking." 

Then the elder sister took up the fairy story 
again, to see how many things were left out, for 
those, she thought, would do to go into her book. 



26 WRITING A BOOK. 



The little one said to herself, "Really, it is no good 
thinking about kings and queens until I have known 
some, so I must wait ; " and while the brother was 
considering about the pig, and the pony, and the 
white rabbit, he fell asleep. 

So the book is not written yer, but when it is we 
shall know a great deal. 



27 



THE RABBIT. 

THE moon is shining o'er the field, 
A little breeze is blowing, 
The radish leaves are crisp and green, 
The lettuces are growing. 

The owl is in the ivy-bush, 
With both his eyes a-winking ; 

The rabbit shakes his little tail, 
And sits him down a-thinking 

" Oh ! where are all the dormice gone ? 

And are the frogs a-\vooing ? 
Will no one come to play with me ? 

What are they all a-doing ? " 

Poor little rabbit, all alone, 

Don't let the master meet you ; 

He'll shoot you with his little gun, 
And merrily he'll eat you 1 



28 



THE SANDY CAT. 

THE sandy cat sat by the kitchen fire. Yester- 
day it had had no supper ; this morning 
everyone had forgotten it. All night it had caught 
no mice ; all day as yet it had tasted no milk. A 
little grey mouse, a saucerful of milk, a few fish or 
chicken bones, would have satisfied it ; but no grey 
mouse, with its soft stringy tail behind it, ran across 
the floor ; no milk was near, no chicken bones, no 
fish, no anything. The serving-maid had been 
washing clothes, and was hanging them out to dry. 
The children had loitered on their way to school, 
and were wondering what the master would say to 
them. The father had gone to the fair to help a 
neighbour to choose a horse. The mother sat 
making a patchwork quilt. No one thought of the 
sandy cat ; it sat by the fire alone and hungry. 

At last the clothes were all a-drying, the children 
had been scolded, and sat learning a lesson for the 
morrow. The father came from the fair, and the 
patchwork quilt was put away. The serving-maid 
put on a white apron with a frill, and a clean cap, 
then taking the sandy cat in her arms, said, 
" Pussy, shall we go into the garden ? " So they 
went and walked up and down, up and down the 
pathway, till at last they stopped before a rose tree ; 



THE SAND Y CA T. 29 

the serving-maid held up the cat to smell the roses, 
but with one long bound it leaped from her arms 
and away away away. 

Whither? 

Ah, dear children, I cannot tell, for I was not 
there to see ; but if ever you are a sandy cat 
you will know that it is a terrible thing to be 
asked to smell roses when you are longing for a 
saucerful of milk and a grey mouse with a soft 
stringy tail 



ON THE WAY TO THE SUN. 

HE had journeyed a long way, and was very 
tired. It seemed like a dream when he 
stood up after a sleep in the field, and looked over 
the wall, and saw the garden, and the flowers, and 
the children playing all about. He looked at the 
long road behind him, at the dark wood and the 
barren hills ; it was the world to which he 
belonged. He looked at the garden before him, at 
the big house, and the terrace, and the steps that 
led down to the smooth lawn it was the world 
which belonged to the children. 

" Poor boy," said the elder child, " I will get you 
something to eat." 

" But where did he come from ? " the gardener 
asked. 

"We do not know," the child answered; "but he 
is very hungry, and mother says we may give him 
some food." 

" I will take him some milk," said the little one ; 
in one hand she carried a mug and with the other 
she pulled along her little broken cart. 

" But what is he called ? " asked the gardener. 

" We do not know," the little one answered ; 
"but he is very thirsty, and mother says we may 
give him some milk." 



ON THE WA Y TO THE SUN. 31 



"Where is he going ? " asked the gardener. 

" We do not know," the children said ; " but he 
is very tired." 

When the boy had rested well, he got up saying, 
" I must not stay any longer," and turned to go on 
his way. 

"What have you to do ?" the children asked. 

" I am one of the crew, and must help to make 
the world go round," he answered. 

" Why do we not help too ? " 

" You are the passengers." 

" How far have you to go ? " they asked. 

" Oh, a long way ! " he answered. " On and on 
until I can touch the sun." 

"Will you really touch it?" they said, 
awestruck. 

" I dare say I shall tire long before I get there," 
he answered sadly. " Perhaps without knowing it, 
though, I shall reach it in my sleep," he added. 
But they hardly heard the last words, for he was 
already far off. 

"Why did you talk to him? " the gardener said. 
"He is just a working boy." 

"And we do nothing ! It was very good of him 
to notice us," they said, humbly. 

"Good !" said the gardener in despair. "Why, 
between you and him there is a great difference." 

" There was only a wall," they answered. 
" Who set it up ? " they asked curiously. 



32 ON THE WA Y TO THE SUN. 



" Why, the builders, of course. Men set it up." 

" And who will pull it down ? " 

"It will not want any pulling down," the man 
answered grimly. "Time will do that." 

As the children went back to their play, they 
looked up at the light towards which the boy was 
journeying. 

" Perhaps we too shall reach it some day," they 
said. 



IN THE MOONLIGHT. 

HE picked a buttercup, and held it up to her 
chin. " Do you like butter?'"' he asked. 

" Butter!" she exclaimed. "They are not made 
into butter. They are made into crowns for the 
Queen ; she has a new one every morning." 

" I'll make you a crown," he said. " You shall 
wear it to-night." 

" But where will my throne be ?" she asked. 

" It shall be on the middle step of the stile by 
the corn-field." 

So when the moon rose I went out to see. 

He wore a red jacket and his cap with the 
feather in it. Round her head there was a wreath 
of buttercups ; it was not much like a crown. On 
one side of the wreath there were some daisies, 
and on the other was a little bunch of blackberry- 
blossom. 

" Come and dance in the moonlight," he said ; 
so she climbed up and over the stile, and stood in 
the corn-field holding out her two hands to him. 
He took them in his, and then they danced round 
and round all down the pathway, while the wheat 
nodded wisely on either side, and the poppies 
awoke and wondered. On they went, on and on 
through the corn-field towards the broad green 
3 



34 IN THE 'MOONLIGHT. 



meadows stretching far into the distance. On and 
on, he shouting for joy, and she laughing out so 
merrily that the sound travelled to the edge of the 
wood, and the thrushes heard, and dreamed of 
Spring. On they went, on and on, and round and 
round, he in his red jacket, and she with the wild 
flowers dropping one by one from her wreath. On 
and on in the moonlight, on and on till they had 
danced all down the corn-field, till they had crossed 
the green meadows, till they were hidden in the 
mist beyond. 

That is all I know ; but I think that in the far fat- 
off somewhere, where the moon is shining, he and 
she still dance along a corn-field, he in his red 
jacket, and she with the wild flowers dropping from 
her hair. 



35 



THE POOR LITTLE DOLL. 

IT was a plain little doll that had been bought 
for sixpence at a stall in the market-place. It 
had scanty hair and a weak composition face, a 
calico body and foolish feet that always turned 
inwards instead of outwards, and from which the 
sawdust now and then oozed. Yet in its glass eyes 
there was an expression of amusement ; they 
seemed to be looking not at you but through you, 
and the pursed-up red lips were always smiling at 
what the glass eyes saw. 

" Well, you are a doll," the boy said, looking up 
from his French exercise. "And what are you 
staring at me for is there anything behind?" he 
asked, looking over has shoulder. The doll made 
no answer. "And whatever are you smiling for?" 
he asked ; " I believe you are always smiling. I 
believe you'd go on if I didn't do my exercise till 
next year, or if the cat died, or the monument 
tumbled down." But still the doll smiled in silence, 
and the boy went on with his exercise. Presently 
he looked up again and yawned. " I think I'll go 
for a stroll," he said, and put his book by. " I 
know what I'll do," he said, suddenly ; " I'll take 
that doll and hang it up to the apple tree to scare 
away the sparrows." And calling out, " Sis, I have 



36 THE POOR LITTLE DOLL. 



taken your doll ; I'm going to make a scarecrow of 
it," he went off to the garden. 

His sister rushed after him, crying out, " Oh, my 
poor doll ! oh, my dear little doll ! What are you 
doing to it, you naughty boy ? " 

" It's so ugly," he said. 

" No, it is not ugly," she cried. 

" And it's so stupid, it never does anything but 
smile, it can't even grow, it never gets any 
bigger." 

" Poor darling doll," Sis said, as she got it once 
more safely into her arms, "of course you can't 
grow, but it is not your fault, they did not make any 
tucks in you to let out." 

" And it's so unfeeling. It went smiling away 
like anything when I could not do my French." 

" It has no heart. Of course it can't feel." 

" Why hasn't it got a heart ? " 

" Because it isn't alive. You ought to be sorry 
for it, and very, very kind to it, poor thing." 

"Well, what is it always smiling for?" 

" Because it is so good," answered Sis, bursting 
into tears. " It is never bad-tempered ; it never 
complains, and it never did anything unkind," and, 
kissing it tenderly, "you are always good and 
sweet," she said, " and always look smiling, though 
you must be very unhappy at not being alive." 



37 



THE VIOLETS. 

THE sun came out and shone down on the 
leafless trees that cast hardly any shadows 
on the pathway through the woods. 

" Surely the Spring is coming," the birds said ; 
11 it must be time to wake the flowers." 

The thrush, and the lark, and the linnet sang 
sweetly. A robin flew up from the snow, and 
perched upon a branch ; a little ragged boy at the 
end of the wood stopped and listened. 

" Surely the Spring is coming," he too said ; 
" and mother will get well." 

The flowers that all through the Winter had 
been sleeping in the ground heard the birds, but 
they were drowsy, and longed to sleep on. At last 
the snowdrops came up and looked shiveringly 
about ; and a primrose leaf peeped through the 
ground, and died of cold. Then some violets 
opened their blue eyes, and, hidden beneath the 
tangle of the wood, listened to the twittering of the 
birds. The little ragged boy came by ; he saw 
the tender flowers, and, stooping down, gathered 
them one by one, and put them into a wicker 
basket that hung upon his arm. 

" Dear flowers," he said, with a sigh, as if loth 
to pick them, "you will buy poor mother some 



38 THE VIOLETS. 



breakfast," and, tying them up into little bunches, 
he carried them to the town. All the morning he 
stood by the road-side, offering his flowers to the 
passers-by, but no one took any notice of him; and 
his face grew sad and troubled. " Poor mother ! " 
he said, longingly ; and the flowers heard him, and 
sighed. 

"Those violets are very sweet," a lady said as 
she passed ; the boy ran after her. 

" Only a penny," he said, "just one penny, for 
mother is at home." Then the lady bought them, 
and carried them to the beautiful house in which 
she lived, and gave them some water, touching 
them so softly that the poor violets forgot to long 
for the woods, and looked gratefully up into hei 
face. 

" Mother," said the boy, " see, I have brought 
some bread for your breakfast. The violets sent 
it to you," and he put the little loaf down before 
her. 

The birds knew nothing of all this, and went on 
singing till the ground was covered with flowers, 
till the leaves had hidden the brown branches of 
the trees, and the pathway through the woods was 
all shade, save for the sunshine that flecked it with 
light. 



39 

THE FIDDLER. 

r I "HE fiddler played upon his fiddle 
J- All through that leafy June, 
He always played hey-diddle-diddle, 
And played it out of tune. 

And down the hill the children came, 

And down the valley too : 
I never heard the fiddler's name, 

So cannot tell it you. 

Hey-diddle-diddle, diddle-diddle-dee. 

On on they came, and when they heard 

That tune so swift and sweet, 
They did not say a single word, 

But shuffled with their feet. 

Then round they went, and round and round, 
All to that cracked old fiddle, 

And still was heard the magic sound } 
Hey-diddle-diddle-didd^ 
Hey-diddle-diddle, diddle-diddle-dee. 



THE BROKEN HORSE. 

r T^HEY were all very sad, and the girl in the pink 
-L frock was crying bitterly, for they had been 
to the woods, and on the way home the wooden 
horse had fallen over on one side and broken off 
his head. 

" Don't cry so, pray don't cry so," the little one 
said, as she knelt down in front of her sister, 
and tried to kiss her. 

"And oh, sister," said the brother, " it would 
have been far worse if he had lost his tail too. 
Besides, perhaps he does not mind much ; it is not 
as if he were alive." 

" Ah, yes," sobbed the tall girl. " But when you 
are as old as I am you will know that it is a 
terrible thing to lose your h j ad, even if it is only 
wooden." 



THE RAINBOW-MAKER. 

'""HHE children stood under an archway. Behind 
J- them was the blue sky ; in front of them the 
clear, still lake that wandered and wound about the 
garden ; above their heads the leaves of a tree 
whispered and told strange stories to the breeze. 

" Poor tree ! it is sighing for the blossoms the 
wind has carried away," they said to each other, 
and they looked back at the garden. " And, poor 
flowers, too," they said, "all your bright colours 
are gone, and your petals lie scattered on the 
ground ; to-morrow they will be dead." "Ah, no," 
the flowers sighed, " the rainbow-maker will gather 
them up, and once more they will see the sun." 
Before the children could answer, a tall fair maiden 
came down the pathway. They could see her plainly 
in the twilight. Her eyes were dim with gathering 
tears, but on her lips there was a smile that came 
and went and flickered round her mouth. All 
down her back hung her pale golden hair ; round 
her neck was a kerchief of many colours ; her dress 
was soft and white, and her snowy apron was 
gathered up in one hand. She looked neither to 
the right nor to the left. She did not utter a single 
word ; and the children could hear no sound of her 
footstep, no rustling from her dress. She stooped, 



42 THE RAINBOW-MAKER. 



and picking up the fading petals, looked at them 
tenderly for a moment, while the tears fell slowly 
down her cheeks ; but the smile hovered round her 
mouth ; for she knew that they would shine again 
in the sight of their beloved sun. When her apron 
was quite full, she turned round and left the garden. 
Hand-in-hand the children followed. She went 
slowly on by the side of the lake, far, far away 
across the meadows and up the farthest hill, until 
at last she found her home behind a cloud just 
opposite the sun. There she sat all through 
the summer days making rainbows. When the 
children had watched her for a long long time, they 
went softly back to their own home. The rainbow- 
maker had not even seen them. 

"Mother," they said one day, u we know now 
where the colours go from the flowers. See, they 
are there," and as they spoke they thought of the 
maiden sitting silently at work in her cloud-home. 
They knew that she was weeping at sending forth 
her most beautiful one, and yet smiling as she 
watched the soft archway she had made. " See, they 
are all there, dear mother," the children repeated, 
looking at the falling rain and the shining sun, and 
pointing to the rainbow that spanned the river. 



43 



OVER THE PORRIDGE. 

THEY sat down to eat their porridge. The 
naughty little girl turned her back upon her 
sister, and put a large spoonful into her mouth. 

" Oh oh oh ! " she cried, " I have burnt my 
tongue." 

" Eat it slowly," said the good little sister. She 
took up her porridge carefully, and after blowing it 
very gently, and waiting for a minute or two while 
it cooled, ate it, and found it very nice. 

" I shall not eat mine until it is quite cold," said 
Totsey, getting cross. 

"Then it will be nasty," said the good little 
sister, still going on with her own porridge. 

" Oh, dear," said Totsey, " if I eat it too hot it 
burns me, and if I eat it too cold it's nasty. What 
shall I do ? " 

" Take it as I do mine," said the good little sister. 
" It is the right way." 

" There are two wrong ways and only one right 
way ; it isn't fair," sighed the naughty little girl. 
"And, oh! my porridge is so nasty." Then she 
asked, " Did you ever eat your porridge too hot 
and burn your tongue ? " 

" No," answered the good little sister ; " I never 
ate my porridge too hot and burnt my tongue." 



44 OVER THE PORRIDGE. 



" Did you ever eat your porridge when it was 
quite cold and very nasty ?" 

" No," answered the good little sister again ; " I 
never ate my porridge when it was quite cold and 
very nasty." 

" Well, I have," said Totsey ; " and so I know 
about two things that you do not know about." 
And the naughty little sister got up and walked 
away, and the good little sister sat still and thought 
about many things. 



A-COMING DOWN THE STREET. 



THE baby she has golden hair, 
Her cheeks are like a rose, 
And she sits fastened in her chair, 

A-counting of her toes. 
The mother she stands by the door, 

And all the place is neat, 
She says, " When it is half-past four, 
He'll come along the street." 
And O ! in all this happy world 

There's not a sight so sweet, 
As 'tis to see the master, dear, 
A-coming down the street. 
A-coming O ! a-coming O ! 
A-coming down the street. 



The baby's sister toddles round, 

And sings a little song, 
And every word and every sound 

Says, " Father won't be Jong." 
And when he comes we'll laugh for glee, 

And then his bonnie face, 



46 A-COMING DOWN THE STREET. 



However dark the day may be, 
Makes sunshine in the place. 
And O ! in all this happy world 

There's not a sight so sweet, 
As 'tis to see the master, dear, 
A-coming down the street, 
A-coming O ! a-coming O ! 
A-coming down the street. 



47 



THE PROUD BOY. 

r I ^HERE was once a very proud boy. He 
-I- always walked through the village with his 
eyes turned down and his hands in his pockets. 
The boys used to stare at him, and say nothing ; 
and when he was out of sight, they breathed freely. 
So the proud boy was lonely, and would have had 
no friends out of doors if it had not been for two 
stray dogs, the green trees, and a flock of geese 
upon the common. 

One day, just by the weaver's cottage, he met 
the tailor's son. Now the tailor's son made more 
noise than any other boy in the village, and when 
he had done anything wrong he stuck to it, and 
said he didn't care ; so the neighbours thought 
that he was very brave, and would do wonders 
when he came to be a man, and some of them 
hoped he would be a great traveller, and stay long 
in distant lands. When the tailor's son saw the 
proud boy he danced in front of him, and made 
faces, and provoked him sorely, until, at last, the 
proud boy turned round and suddenly boxed the 
ears of the tailor's son, and threw his hat into the 
road. The tailor's son was surprised, and, without 
waiting to pick up his hat, ran away, and sitting 
down in the carpenter's yard, cried bitterly. After 



48 1HE PROUD BOY. 



a few minutes, the proud boy came to him and 
returned him his hat, saying politely 

"There is no dust on it ; you deserved to have 
your ears boxed, but I am sorry I was so rude as 
to throw your hat on to the road." 

" I thought you were proud," said the tailor's 
son, astonished ; " I didn't think you'd say that I 
wouldn't." 

" Perhaps you are not proud ?" 

" No, I am not." 

" Ah, that makes a difference," said the proud 
boy, still more politely. "When you are proud, 
and have done a foolish thing, you make a point of 
owning it." 

" But it takes a lot of courage," said the tailor's 
son. 

"Oh, dear, no," answered the proud boy ; "it only 
takes a lot of cowardice not to ; " and then turning 
his eyes down again, he softly walked away. 



49 



SEEKING THE VIOLETS. 

ALL the wood had been blue with violets, but 
now they were nearly gone. The birds sang 
louder and louder to keep them and to call them 
back, but soon there was not a violet left in all 
the wood from end to end. The snowdrops died, 
and the primrose faded, the cowslips and blue-bells 
vanished, the thorn grew white with blossom, 
the wild honeysuckle filled the wood with its 
fragrance, and soon the fruit began to ripen. 

The blackbirds and the swallows and the chaf- 
finches, and all the birds they knew, gathered round 
the garden trees and bushes, and forgot the woods, 
until suddenly one day they espied a little child. 
She was sitting on a chair under a tree ; she had a 
little table before her and a pink ribbon round her 
hat ; she was eating fruit with a large silver spoon. 
The birds were afraid, and held aloof until a 
sparrow chirped and the qhild looked up, and 
when they saw how blue her eyes were, they sang 
out bravely and fluttered round her, thinking that 
she had brought them news from the violets. But 
she never looked up again, though the birds 
crowded on to the branch above her, and perched 
upon' the table, and rubbed their little beaks against 
her plate. She just held on her hat with one hand, 
4 



50 SEEKING THE VIOLETS. 



and with the other went on taking up fruit with a 
silver spoon. 

"Ah, dear child," a swallow twittered, "perhaps 
you do not know what is written in your eyes ; so 
many of us carry secrets that we ourselves know 
last of all" 



TOMMY'S STOCKINGS. 

TWO little maids went out one day, 
And really it was shocking ! 
They met poor Tommy on the way, 
With holes in either stocking. 

They sat down on a low stone seat, 
And to and fro kept rocking, 

While they knitted, swift and neat, 
Each of them a stocking. 

And sweet they sang a little song, 
The dickie-birds kept mocking ; 

And Tommy wished that all day long 
They'd sit and knit a stocking. 



MIDSUMMER-NIGHT. 

THE children were very much puzzled what to 
do, for it was Midsummer-night, and they 
knew that there was a dream belonging to it ; but 
how to come across it they could not tell. They 
knew that the dream had something to do with 
fairies, a queen, and all manner of lovely things ; 
but that was all. At first they thought they would 
sit up with the doors and windows open, and the 
dog on the steps ready to bark if he saw anything 
unusual. Then they felt sure that they could not 
dream while they were wide-awake, so three of 
them went to bed, and one dozed in a corner of the 
porch, with her clothes on. Presently the dog 
barked, and two children in their ni^ht-gowns ran 
out to see, and one took off her night-cap and looked 
out of window ; but it was only old Nurse coming 
back from a long gossip with the village black- 
smith's wife and mother-in-law. So the dog looked 
foolish, and Nurse was angry, and put them all to 
bed without any more ado. 

"Oh," they cried, "but the fairies, and the queen, 
and the flowers 1 What shall we do to see them ? " 

" Go to sleep," said Nurse, " and the dream may 
come to you ; you can't go to a dream," she 
added, for you see she was just a peasant woman, 



MIDSUMMER-NIGHT. 53 



and had never travelled far, or into any land but 
her own. 

So the children shut their eyes tightly and went 
to sleep, and I think that they saw something, for 
their eyes were very bright next morning, and one of 
them whispered to me, softly, " The queen wore a 
wreath of flowers last night, dear mother, and, oh, 
she was very beautiful." 



54 



THE LITTLE MAID. 

A LITTLE maid went to market, 
She went into the town, 
And all the things she had to buy 

She carefully wrote down. 
The coffee, sugar, tea, and rice 

The currant cake for tea, 
And then she had to reckon up, 
And see how much they'd be. 

She sat her down as she came back, 

She sat her down to see 
What they had cost the currant cake, 

The coffee, and the tea. 
She could not make her money right, 

And yet, how she did try ! 
She could not make her money right, 

And oh ! how she did cry. 

She's counting still, my dears, my dears, 

She's counting day and night, 
But though she counts for years and years, 

She'll never make it right. 
She'll never make it right right right, 

Oh ! never any more, [count, 

Though she sits counting count count 

Till she is ninety-four. 



WAR 

I DON'T like you," said he, in a rage. 
"You are a naughty boy," said she, 
crossly. 

" I shall never speak to you again." 

" I shall never play with you any more." 

" I don't care." 

" And I don't care." 

" I shall tell of you." 

" All right. I shall tell of you." 

" Nasty mean thing to threaten." 

" You threatened first." 

" Nasty, disagreeable thing." 

" Ugly* unkind boy." Then they turned back to 
back, and stood sulking. He put his hands into his 
pockets, and she sucked her finger. 

" That's the worst of a girl," thought he ; "I 
shan't give in." 

" I can't bear boys," thought she ; " and I won't 
make it up to-day." 

" We might have had good fun all this afternoon 
if she hadn't been so silly," he thought presently. 

" It would have been so nice if he hadn't been 
disagreeable," she thought after a bit. Then he 
began to fidget and to kick the floor a little with 
one foot, and she began to cry and to wipe her 
tears away very softly and quickly, so that he might 
not see them. 



PEACE. 

HE looked over his shoulder quickly. She 
saw him, and turned still more quickly 
away. "I shall go and take a long walk in the 
woods," he said. 

"You don't know where the rabbit-holes are," 
she answered. 

" Yes, I do ; I found them out the other day." 

t{ I shall go out with Mary." 

"All right." 

" And I shall never go into the woods with you 
any more." 

" Very well. I don't care," he said. Then she 
broke down and sobbed. 

" You are a very unkind boy." 

" It's all your fault." 

" No, it's all yours. You began." 

" No, you began." 

" You don't like me now," she sobbed. 

" Yes, I do." 

" You said I was a nasty, disagreeable thing." 

" Well, I didn't mean it if I did. You said I was 
an ugly, unkind boy." 

" Oh, but I didn't mean it," she said. 

" You know I'm very fond of you." 

" So am I of you." 



PEACE. 57 



" All right, then, let's make it up." So he turned 
round quickly and she turned round slowly, and he 
put his arms round her waist, and she put her 
hands up on to his shoulders, and they kissed each 
other, and hugged each other, and rubbed noses, 
and laughed. 

" Shall we go to the woods ? " she asked, doubt- 
fully. 

" Yes, come along." 

" You said you'd go without me," she pouted. 

" Oh, but I shouldn't have liked it a bit." 

" And I should have been so unhappy," she said. 

"And now we just will have a game," he an- 
swered, as hand-in-hand they went off as fast as 
they could scamper. 



MY LITTLE BROTHER. 

MY baby brother's fat, as fat 
As any boy can be, 
And he is just the sweetest duck 
That ever you did see. 

I count the dimples in his hands 

A dozen times a- day, 
And often wonder when he coos 

What he would like to say. 

I comb the down upon his head- 
He has'nt any hair, 

It must be cold without, and yet 
He never seems to care. 

It is so nice to see him kick, 
He has such pretty feet ; 

I think if we might eat him up 
It would be quite a treat. 



59 



THE KITE. 

IT was the most tiresome kite in the world, 
always wagging its tail, shaking its ears, 
breaking its string, sitting down on the tops of 
houses, getting stuck in trees, entangled in hedges, 
flopping down on ponds, or lying flat on the grass, 
and refusing to rise higher than a yard from the 
ground. 

I have often sat and thought about that kite, and 
wondered who its father and mother were. Per- 
haps they were very poor people, just made of 
newspaper and little bits of common string knotted 
together, obliged to fly day and night for a living, 
and never able to give any time to their children or 
to bring them up properly. It was pretty, for it 
had a snow-white face, and pink and white ears ; 
and, with these, no one, let alone a kite, could help 
being pretty. But though the kite was pretty, it 
was not good, and it did not prosper ; it came to a 
bad end, oh ! a terrible end indeed. It stuck itself 
on a roof one day, a common red roof with a 
broken chimney and three tiles missing. It stuck 
itself there, and it would not move ; the children 
tugged and pulled and coaxed and cried, but still it 
would not move. At last they fetched a ladder, 
and had nearly reached it when suddenly the kite 



60 THE KITE. 



started and flew away right away over the field 
and over the heath, and over the far far woods, and 
it never came back again never never. 

Dear, that is all. But I think sometimes that 
perhaps beyond the dark pines and the roaring sea 
the kite is flying still, on and on, farther and farther 
away, for ever and for ever. 



6i 



THE TINKER'S MARRIAGE. 

TWO beaux and a belle, a goat and a carriage, 
They all set off to the tinker's marriage. 
Two three-cornered hats, and one with a feather, 
They looked very fine in the sweet summer weather 
But the carriage turned over, the poor goat shied, 
The little belle laughed, the silly beaux cried, 
And the tinker fumed, " Oh, why do they tarry ? 
And why don't they come tc see me marry ? 
I shall throw my bride right into the sea, 
If they are not here by half-past three." 
But the belle was laughing, " Oh, what shall we do !" 
And the beaux were crying, " Bee bee-bee-boo." 



62 



THE CHILDREN AND THE GARLAND. 

" r ~pO-MORROW is May-day," the children said ; 

J- " the birds must call us very early, and we 
will go to the woods and make a garland." And in 
the morning, long before the sun had looked over the 
tops of the houses into the village street, they were 
far away in the woods. 

" I will give them some roses as they come 
back," the gardener said. " They shall put them 
among the spring flowers, as a swallow among the 
thrushes, to show that summer is on its way." 

When the children had made their garland and a 
posy for each one of them, they went singing all 
down the village street, over the grey stone bridge, 
beyond the hayricks, and past the houses on the 
hill-side. 

In one of the houses there was a pale little child 
with a sad, thin face. " Mother," he said, " here 
are some children with a garland. Will it be 
summer when they have gone by?" He called 
after them as they went on, " Come back, oh, 
come back again ! " 

" Yes, we will come back," they answered, but 
they went on their way singing. All through the 
day he waited for them, but they did not come ; 
and at last, when it was evening, the mother took 



THE GARLAND. 63 



him up into her arms to carry him to his bed. 
Suddenly he heard the children singing in the 
distance. " Oh, mother," he exclaimed, " they are 
coming ; " and he watched till they came up the 
hill again and stood before him. " But where is 
your garland ? " he asked. 

" We gave it to lame Mary, the postman's wife, 
for she is always longing to see the fields," they 
answered ; " but these roses are for you, dear little 
boy ; they are all for you," and putting them into 
his hands they went back to the village. 

" You are very tired," the child said to the roses ; 
" all your leaves are drooping. Poor roses, perhaps 
you are lonely away from the garden ; but you shall 
sleep near me, and there is a star rising up in the 
sky ; it will watch us all through the night." Then 
the child nestled down in his white bed he and 
his little warm heart, in which there was love for all 
things. While he slept the roses looked at his pale 
little face and sighed, and presently they stole 
softly on to his cheeks and rested there. The 
children saw them still there when the summer was 
over ; when the garland was quite dead, and lame 
Mary longed for the fields no more. 



6 4 



ROUND THE TEA-TABLE. 

A NICE little party we're seated at tea, 
The dollies all seem very glad, 
Save the poor little thing who is leaning on me ; 

I fear that she feels rather bad ; 
Poor limp little thing ! she wants a back-bone, 

She's only just made up of rag. 
There's little Miss Prim sitting up all alone, 
And the Japanese looks like a wag. 

Now what shall we talk of, my own dollies fair ? 

And what shall we give you for tea ? 
That queer little thing with the short frizzy hair, 

Why does he keep looking at me? 
My sister and I we will sing you a song 

Before we get up from the table ; 
It shall not be sad, and it shall not be long 

We'll sing it as well as we're able. 

SONG. 

The darkness is stealing all over the place, 
The flowers are weeping for sorrow, 

The daisy is hiding its little round face, 
The sun has gone seeking to-morro\v. 



ROUND THE TEA-TABLE. 65 



So while you are seated all round the tea-table, 
Please join in the chorus as well as you're able ; 
O ! sing ! sing away for your life. 

CHORUS. 

It's time to cut off the dicky birds' noses, 
Time to cut off the dicky birds 3 noses, 
It's time to cut off the dicky birds' noses, 
So bring me the carving-knife. 

The darkness is hiding the birds on the trees, 
The thrushes are weary of singing, 

A strange little rumour is borne on the breeze 
Of Summer the swallows are bringing. 

So while you are seated all round the tea-table, 
Please join in the chorus as well as you're able ; 
O ! sing ! sing away for your life. 

CHORUS. 

It's time to cut off the dicky birds' noses, 
Time to cut off the dicky birds' noses, 
It's time to cut off the dicky birds' noses, 
So bring me the carving-knife. 

The Summer is stealing all over the place, 
The wind is all scented wjth roses, 

The dear little birds are all flying a race, 
On purpose to give us their noses. 
5 



66 ROUND THE TEA-TABLE. 



So while you are seated all round the tea-table, 
Please join in the chorus as well as you're able ; 
O ! sing ! sing away for your life. 

CHORUS. 

It's time to cut off the dicky birds' noses 
Time to cut off the dicky birds' noses, 
It's time to cut off the dicky birds' noses, 
So bring me the carving-knife. 



TOMMY. 

'"POMMY was sitting on the bench near the 
JL end of the lane. By his side was a basin 
tied up in a cotton handkerchief; in the button- 
hole of his coat there was a sprig of sweet-william. 
The girls from the big house came and stood still 
in front of him, staring at him rudely, but he did 
not speak. 

" Tommy, are -you tired ? " they asked. 

" Yes," Tommy answered, crossly, " I'm very 
tired, and father's working in the fields, and I have 
got to take him his dinner before I go to the fair." 

" Why don't the servants take it ? " 

" Servants ! " said Tommy scornfully ; " we've no 
servants. We are not rich people ! " 

" Wouldn't you like to be rich ? " the eldest 
sister asked, while the two little ones walked slowly 
round Tommy, looking at the feather in his hat ; 
he had put it there so that he might look smart 
when he went on to the village. 

" No, it's too expensive," said Tommy, shaking 
his head ; " rich people have to buy such a lot of 
things, and to wear fine clothes, and they can't have 
dinner in the fields." 

" My father has his dinner in a room," said the 
girl. 



68 TOMMY. 



"That's because he's rich," answered Tommy, 
" and people would talk if he didn't ; rich people 
can't do as they like, as poor can." 

"And my father lives in a big house," the girl 
went on, for she was vulgar, and liked to boast. 

" Yes, and it takes up a lot of room ; my father's 
got the whole world to live in if he likes ; that's 
better than a house." 

"But my father doesn't work," said the girl, 
scornfully. 

" Mine does," said Tommy, proudly. " Rich 
people can't work," he went on, "so they are 
obliged to get the poor folk to do it. Why, we 
have made everything in the world. Oh ! it's a 
fine thing to be poor." 

" But suppose all the rich folk died, what would 
the poor folk do?" 

" But suppose all the poor folk died," cried 
Tommy, " what would the rich folk do ? They can 
sit in carriages, but can't build them, and eat 
dinners, but can't cook them." And he got up and 
went his way. " Poor folk ought to be very kind 
to rich folk, for it's hard to be the like of them," 
he said to himself as he went along. 



6 9 



THE SWALLOWS. 

HP HERE were some children in the north look- 
-L ing at the swallows flying south. " Why are 
they going away ? " the little one asked. 

" The summer is over," the elder sister answered, 
" and if they stayed here they would be starved and 
die of cold, and so, when the summer goes, they 
journey south." 

" Our mother and sisters are in the south," the 
little one said, as they looked after the birds. 
" Dear little swallows, tell mother that we are 
watching for her ! " But they were already flying 
over the sea. The chilly winds tried to follow, but 
the swallows flew so swiftly they were not over- 
taken ; they went on, with the summer always 
before them. They were tired many a time ; once 
they stayed to rest upon the French coast, and 
once, in the Bay of Biscay, they clung to the rigging 
of a ship all through the night, but in the morning 
they went on again. 

Far away in the south, two English children were 
looking from the turret window of an old castle. 

" Here are the swallows," they said ; "perhaps 
they have come from England. Dear swallows, 
have you brought us a message ?" they asked. 

" It was very cold, we had no time for messages; 



70 THE SWALLOWS. 



and we must not lose the track of summer," the 
swallows twittered, and they flew on till they 
reached the African shore. 

" Poor little swallows," said the English children, 
as they watched the ship come into port that was 
to take them back to their own land ; " they have 
to chase the summer and the sun, but we do not 
mind whether it is summer or winter, for if we only 
keep our hearts warm, the rest does not matter." 

" It is very good of the swallows to come to us," 
the elder sister said, in the next spring, when she 
heard their first soft twitter beneath the eaves, " for 
the summer is in many places, and we are so far 
from the south." 

"Yes, it is very good of them to come," the 
children answered ; " dear little swallows, perhaps 
they love us 1 >} 



A FIRST LOVE-MAKING. 

ALAND there is beyond the sea 
That I have never seen, 
But Johnny says he'll take me there, 

And I shall be a queen. 
He'll build for me a palace there, 

Its roof will be of thatch, 

And it will have a little porch 

And everything to match. 

And he'll give me a garden-green, 

And he'll give me a crown 
Of flowers that love the wood and field 

And never grow in town. 
And we shall be so happy there, 

And never, never part, 
And I shall be the grandest queen 

The queen of Johnny's heart. 

Then, Johnny, man your little boat 

To sail across the sea ; 
There's only room for king and queen 

For Johnny and for me. 
And, Johnny dear, I'm not afraid 

Of any wind or tide, 
For I am always safe, my dear, 

If you are by my side. 



SMUT. 

NOW, this story is quite true. Once upon a 
time there was a cat called Mr. Puff; he 
lived in a grand house, quite close to the Turkish 
Embassy. A lord and a lady 'and several servants 
lived with Mr. Puff; he was very kind to them, 
letting them do in all things as they liked, and 
never sending them away or keeping the house to 
himself. One day Mr. Puff, being out in the rain, 
found a poor little kitten, covered with mud, and 
crying bitterly : so Mr. Puff took the kitten between 
his teeth, carried it home, and set it down on the 
drawing-room hearth-rug. The lord and the lady 
had the kitten washed, and gave it food, and called 
it Smut. Then Smut went and sat him down on 
the lord's writing-table. 

When Smut grew to be a cat, but before he was 
yet a large one, the lord and the lady thought 
awhile, and spoke, " We have a dear friend," they 
said, "and he is catless ; therefore, if Mr. Puff will 
agree, we will take Smut to him as a present." 
And Mr. Puff agreed. So Smut was put into a 
birdcage, for there was nothing else to serve him 
for a travelling carriage, and taken to the dear 
friend's house. The dear friend had a little girl 
with golden hair, and when she saw Smut, she 



SMUT. 73 



cried out for joy, and said, " Never before did I ste 
a dicky-bird with a furry coat, a long tail, and little 
white teeth." But Smut shook his head, as if to 
say, " I am not a dicky-bird, sweet maid, but only 
a four-legged cat ;" then they opened the birdcage 
door, and he walked out, waving his tail. 

Now, when Smut grew up, his gravity and dignity 
made all who knew his history wonder, and few 
could believe that he had once been a dirty kitten, 
covered with mud, glad to accept the charity of Mr. 
Puff. When a year had gone, or perhaps even a 
longer time, there was a great war in Turkey, and 
terrible battles were fought. Then Smut looked 
very anxious, and went quite bald, and his coat fell 
off in little patches ; but none could tell why. At 
last he died, and the little girl wept sorely, and all 
who had known him grieved and lamented. 

And when Smut had been sleeping only a little 
while beneath the lilac tree, accident revealed 
that, instead of a lowly foundling, he had been of 
high degree, for the little vagrant Mr. Puff had 
found was no less a person than the Turkish 
Ambassador's coachman's wife's cat's kitten. 



74 



SEE-SAW. 

f~~* ET into the boat and away to the west, 
vJ See-saw ! see-saw ! 

For they've cut down the tree with the poor linnet's 
nest, 

See- saw ! see-saw ! 
The bulrushes nod and the water-lilies sigh, 

See-saw ! see-saw ! 
And all of us know the sad reason why, 

See-saw ! see-saw 1 

For, oh ! the tree the tree's cut down, 
And every one of its leaves are brown ; 
And in the field the children play, 
But the little linnet has flown away : 

Oh, dear ! oh, dear ! oh, dear 1 



75 



THE BAD GIRL. 

SHE was always called the bad girl, for she hod 
once, when she was very little, put out her 
tongue at the postman. She lived alone with her 
grandmother and her three brothers in the cottage 
beyond the field, and the girls in the village took no 
notice of her. The bad girl did not mind this, for 
she was always thinking of the cuckoo clock. The 
clock stood in one corner of the cottage, and every 
hour a door opened at the top of its face, and a 
little cuckoo came out and called its name just the 
same number of times that the clock ought to have 
struck, and called it so loudly and in so much haste 
that the clock was afraid to strike at all. The bad 
girl was always wondering whether it was worse for 
the clock to have a cupboard in its forehead, and a 
bird that was always hopping in and out, or for the 
poor cuckoo to spend so much time in a dark little 
prison. " If it could only get away to the woods," 
she said to herself, " who knows but its voice might 
grow sweet, and even life itself might come to it ! " 
She thought of the clock so much that her grand- 
mother used to say 

" Ah, lassie, if you would only think of me some- 
times ! " But the bad girl would answer 

"You are not in prison, granny dear, and you 



76 THE BAD GIRL. 



have not even a bee in your bonnet, let alone a bird 
in your head. Why should I think of you ? " 

One day, close by the farm, she saw the big girls 
from the school gathering flowers. 

" Give me one," she said ; " perhaps the cuckoo 
would like it." But they all cried, " No, no ! " and 
tried to frighten her away. "They are for the 
little one's birthday. To-morrow she will be seven 
years old," they said, " and she is to have a crown 
of flowers and a cake, and all the afternoon we shall 
play merry games with her." 

" Is she unhappy, that you are taking so much 
trouble for her ? " asked the bad girl. 

" Oh, no ; she is very happy : but it will be her 
birthday, and we want to make her happier.** 

"Why?" 

" Because we love her," said one ; 

" Because she is so little," said another ; 

" Because she is alive," said a third. 

" Are all things that live to be loved and cared 
for ? " the bad girl asked, but they were too busy to 
listen, so she went on her way thinking ; and it 
seemed as if all things round the birds, and bees, 
and the rustling leave*, and the little tender wild 
flowers, half hidden in the grass answered, as she 
went along 

"Yes, they are all to be cared for and made 
happier, if it be possible." 

" The cuckoo clock is not alive," she thought. 



THE BAD GIRL. 77 



" Oh, no ; it is not alive," the trees answered ; 
"but many things that do not live have voices, 
and many others are just sign-posts, pointing the 
way." 

" The way ! The way to what, and where ?" 

" We find out for ourselves ; we must all find 
out for ourselves," the trees sighed and whispered 
to each other. 

As the bad girl entered the cottage, the cuckoo 
called out its name eleven times, but she did not 
even look up. She walked straight across to the 
chair by the fireside, and kneeling down, kissed her 
granny's hands. 



MORNING TIME. 

i. 

AWAKE, my pet ! 
What ! slumbering yet, 
When the day's so warm and bright ? 
The flowers that wept 
Before they slept 
O'er the darkness of yesternight, 
Have listened long 
To the lark's wild song, 
And awoke with the morning light. 



Again and again 

Through the window-pane 
The jasmine flowers kept peeping 

And in at the door, 

And along the floor, 
The sunny rays came creeping, 

So I opened wide 

The sash, and tried 
To tell them you were sleeping. 



MORNING TIME. 79 



Awake, my dear, 

The winter drear 
Has fled with all things dreary, 

But quickly by 

The spring will fly, 
And soon the birds will weary. 

Awake while yet 

The dew is wet 
And day is young, my deary. 



8o 



THE PINK PARASOL. 

THE pink parasol had tender whalebone ribs 
and a slender stick of cherry-wood. It lived 
with the wilful child in the white-house, just beyond 
the third milestone. All about the trees were 
green, and the flowers grew tall ; in the pond 
behind the willows the ducks swam round and 
round and dipped their heads beneath the water. 

Every bird and bee, every leaf and flower, loved 
the child and the pink parasol as they wandered in 
the garden together, listening to the birds and 
seeking the shady spots to rest in, or walking up 
and down the long trim pathway in the sunshine. 
Yet the child tired of it all, and before the summer 
was over, was always standing by the gate, watch- 
ing the straight white road that stretched across 
the plain. 

" If I might but see the city, with the busy streets , 
and the eager crowds," he was always saying to 
himself. 

Then all that lived in the garden knew that the 
child would not be with them long. At last the 
day came when he flung down the pink parasol, 
and, without even one last look at the garden, ran 
out at the gate. 

The flowers died, and the swallows journeyed 



THE PINK PARASOL. Hi 



south ; the trees stretched higher and higher, to 
see the child come back across the plain, 
but he never came. " Ah, dear child ! " they 
sighed many a time, " why are you staying? and 
are your eyes as blue as ever ; or have the sad 
tears dimmed them ? and is your hair golden still ? 
and your voice, is it like the singing of the birds ? 
And your heart oh ! my dear, my dear, what is in 
your heart now, that once was so full of summer 
and the sun ? " 

The pink parasol lay on the pathway, where the 
child left it, spoilt by the rain, and splashed by the 
gravel, faded and forgotten. At last, a gipsy lad, 
with dark eyes, a freckled face, and little gold rings 
in his ears, came by ; he picked up the pink 
parasol, hid it under his coat, and carried it to the 
gipsy tent. There it stayed till one day the cherry- 
wood stick was broken into three pieces, and the 
pink parasol was put on the fire to make the water 
boil for the gipsy's tea. 



THE SISTERS. 

' I A HE little sisters went into the room to play at 
1 ball. 

u We must be careful not to wake the white 
cat," the tall one said, softly. 

" Or to spoil the roses," the fat one whispered ; 
" but throw high, dear sister, or we shall never hit 
the ceiling." 

"You dear children," thought the white cat, 
"why do you come to play here at all? Only just 
round the corner are the shady trees, and the birds 
singing on the branches, and the sunshine is 
flecking the pathway. Who knows but what, out 
there, your ball might touch the sky? Here you 
will only disturb me, and perhaps spoil the roses ; 
and at best you can but hit the ceiling 1 " 



THE WHITE RABBITS. 

ALL the white rabbits but two, my dears, 
All the white rabbits but two, 
Away they all sailed in a cockle-shell boat, 
Painted a beautiful blue. 

All the white rabbits so snowy and sleek, 
Away they went down to the shore ; 

Little they thought, so happy and meek, 
They'd never come up from it more. 

Oh, the white rabbits they wept and they sobbed, 
Till the boat it shook up in the sails ; 

Oh, the white rabbits they sobbed and they shook 
From their poor loppy ears to their tails. 

Away they all sailed to a desolate land 

Where never a lettuce-leaf grew, 
All the white rabbits but two, my dears, 

All tho white rabbits but two. 



8 4 



THE WOODEN HORSE. 

" /~"*OME and have a ride," the big brother said. 

^^ " I am afraid," the little one answered ; 
" the horse's mouth is wide open." 

"But it's only wooden. That is the best of a 
horse that isn't real. If his mouth is ever so wide 
open, he cannot shut it. So come," and the big 
brother lifted the little one up, and dragged him 
about. 

" Oh, do stop ! " the little one cried out in terror ; 
"does the horse make that noise along the floor?" 

" Yes." 

"And is it a real noise?" 

" Of course it is," the big brother answered. 

"'But I thought only real things could make real 
things," the little one said ; " where does the 
imitation horse end and the real sound begin ? " 

At this the big brother stood still for a few 
minutes. 

" I was thinking about real and imitation things," 
he said presently. " It's very difficult to tell which 
is which sometimes. You see they get so close 
together that the one often grows into the other, 
and some imitated things become real and some 
real ones become imitation as they go on. But I 



THE WOODEN HORSE. 85 



should say that you are a real coward for not 
having a ride." 

" No, I am not," the little one laughed ; and, 
getting astride the wooden horse, he sat up bravely. 
" Oh, Jack, dear," he said to his brother, " we will 
always be glad that we are real boys, or we too 
might have been made with mouths we were never 
able to shut 1 " 



86 



THE DUCK POND. 

SO little Bridget took the baby on her right arm 
and a jug in her left hand, and went to the 
farm to get the milk. On her way she went by the 
garden-gate of a large house that stood close to the 
farm, and she told the baby a story : 

" Last summer," she said, " a little girl, bigger 
than you, for she was just able to walk, came to 
stay in that house she and her father and mother. 
All about the road just here, the ducks and the 
chickens from the farm, and an old turkey, used to 
walk about all the day long, but the poor little 
ducks were very unhappy, for they had no pond to 
swim about in, only that narrow ditch through 
which the streamlet is flowing. When the little 
girl's father saw this, he took a spade, and worked 
and worked very hard, and out of the ditch and the 
streamlet he made a little pond for the ducks, and 
they swam about and were ve-ry happy all through 
the summer days. Every morning I used to stand 
and watch, and presently the garden-gate would 
open, and then the father would come out, leading 
the little girl by the hand, and the mother brought 
a large plateful of bits of broken bread. The little 
girl used to throw the bread to the ducks, and they 
ran after it and ate it up quickly, while she laughed 



THE DUCK POND. 87 



out with glee,, and the father and the mother 
laughed too just as merrily. Baby, the father had 
blue eyes, and a voice that you seemed to hear with 
your heart. 

" The little girl used to feed the chickens too, 
and the foolish old turkey that was so fond of her 
it would run after her until she screamed and was 
afraid. The dear father and the littte girl came 
out every morning, while the black pigs looked 
through the bars of the farm-yard gate and grunted 
at them, as if they were glad, and I think the ducks 
knew that the father had made the pond, for 
they swam round and round it proudly while he 
watched them, but when he went away they seemed 
tired and sad. 

" The pond is not there now, baby, for a man 
came by one day and made it into a ditch again ; 
and the chickens and the ducks from the farm are 
kept in another place. 

" The little girl is far away in her own home, 
which the father made for her, and the dear father 
lives in his own home too in the hearts of those 
he loved." 

That was the story that Bridget told the baby. 



THE LITTLE MAID. 

HPHERE is a sweet maiden asleep by the sea, 
-L Her lips are as red as a cherry ; 
The roses are resting upon her brown cheeks 
Her cheeks that are brown as a berry. 

She's tired of building up castles of sand, 
Her hands they are gritty and grubby ; 

Her shoes, they are wet, and her legs, they are bare, 
Her legs that are sturdy and chubby. 

I'll wrap a shawl round you, my dear little maid, 
To keep the wind off you completely, 

And soft I will sing you a lullaby song, 
And soon you will slumber most sweetly. 



8 9 



THE DONKEY ON WHEELS. 

r I "HERE was once a poor little donkey on wheels. 
JL It had never wagged its tail, or tossed its head, 
or said, " Hee-haw ! " or tasted a tender thistle. It 
always went about, anywhere that anyone pulled 
it, on four wooden wheels, carrying a foolish knight, 
who wore a large cocked hat and a long cloak, 
because he had no legs. Now, a man who has no 
legs, and rides a donkey on wheels, has little cause 
for pride ; but the knight was haughty, and seldom 
remembered his circumstances. So the donkey 
suffered sorely, and in many ways. 

One day the donkey and the knight were on the 
table in front of the child to whom they both 
belonged. She was cutting out a little doll's frock 
with a large pair of scissors. 

"Mistress," said the knight, "this donkey tries 
my temper. Will you give me some spurs ? " 

" Oh, no, sir knight," the child answered. " You 
would hurt the poor donkey ; besides, you have no 
heels to put them on." 

" Cruel knight !" exclaimed the donkey. " Make 
him get off, dear mistress ; I will cany him no 
longer." 

" Let him stay," said the child, gently ; " he has 
no legs, and cannot walk." 



90 THE DONKEY ON WHEELS. 



" Then why did he want spurs ? " 

" Just the way of the world, dear donkey ; just 
the way of the world." 

" Ah ! " sighed the donkey, " some ways are very 
trying, especially the world's ; " and then it said 
no more, but thought of the fields it would never 
see, and the thistles it would never taste. 



COCK-A-DOODLE. 

I KNOW a lovely dicky-bird, 
A cock-a-doodle-doo ; 
My father and my mother 
And my sister know it too. 

It struts about so gaily, 
And it is brave and strong ; 

And when it crows, it is a crow, 
Both very loud and long. 

Oh, " Cock-a-doodle-doo," it crows, 

And cock-a-doodle won't 
Leave off its cock-a-doodling, 

When mother dear cries " Don't ! " 



THE BOY AND LITTLE GREAT LADY. 

SHE was always called the "little great lady," 
for she lived in a grand house, and was very 
rich. He was a strange boy ; the little great 
lady never knew whence he came, or whither he 
went. She only saw him when the snow lay deep 
upon the ground. Then in the early morning he 
swept a pathway to the stable in which she had 
once kept a white rabbit. When it was quite 
finished, she came down the steps in her wkite 
dress and little thin shoes, with bows on them, and 
walked slowly along the pathway. It was always 
swept so dry she might have worn paper shoes 
without getting them wet. At the far end he 
always stood waiting till she came, and smiled and 
said, " Thank you, little boy," and passed on. Then 
he was no more seen till the next snowy morning, 
when again he swept the pathway ; and again the 
little great lady came down the steps in her dainty 
shoes, and went on her way to the stable. 

But at last, one morning when the snow lay white 
and thick, and she came down the steps as usual, 
there was no pathway. The little boy stood leaning 
on a spade, his feet buried deep in the snow. 

" Where is your broom ? and where is the path- 
way to the rabbit house ? " she asked. 



BOY AND LITTLE GREAT LADY. 93 



" The rabbit is dead, and the broom is worn out," 
he answered ; " and I am tired of making path- 
ways that lead to empty houses." 

" But why have you done it so long ? " she asked. 

" You have bows on your shoes," he said ; 
" and they are so thin you could not walk over the 
snow in them why, you would catch your death of 
cold," he added, scornfully. 

" What would you do if I wore boots ?" 

" I should go and learn how to build ships, or 
paint pictures, or write books. But I should not 
think of you so much," he said. 

The little great lady answered eagerly, " Go and 
learn how to do all those things ; I will wait till 
you come back and tell me what you have done," 
and she turned and went into the house. 

" Good-bye," the boy said, as he stood watching 
for a moment the closed door ; " dear little great 
lady, good-bye." And he went along the unmade 
pathway beyond the empty rabbit house. 



94 



GOOD-DAY, GENTLE FOLK. 

OH, yes, sir and miss, I have been to the 
town ; 

It really was pleasant and gay ; 
But now I must hurry, the sun's going down, 

And so I will wish you good-day. 
And so I will wish you good-day, gentle folk, 
And so I will wish you good-day. 

I know a white rabbit just over the hill, 

He's eating a lettuce for tea ; 
And a fat speckled duck, with a very large bill, 

Is quacking, " Oh, where can she be ?" 
And two little mice are there, standing quite still, 

They're all of them waiting for me. 

For we all love the stars and the little pale moon, 
Beneath them we frolic and play ; 

My friends have been waiting the whole afternoon, 
And so I will wish you good-day. 

And so I will wish you good-day, gentle folk, 
And so I will wish you good-day. 


in a town of persia lived two brothers, sons 
of a poor man ; one named Cassim, the other 
All Baba, Cassim, the elder., married a wife 
with a considerable fortune, and lived at his 
case ; but the wife of Ali Baba, was as poor as 
himself; they dwelt in a mean cottage in the 
suburbs, and he maintained his family by 
cutting wood. Ali Baba, was in the forest pre- 
paring to load his asses, with the faggots he had 
cut, when he saw a troop of horsemen ap- 
proaohing. He hastily climbed a large thiclr 




tree, and hid himself among the branches. AH 
Baba counted forty of them: each took a load- 
ed portmanteau from his horse, and turning to 
the rock, said 'Open Sesame];' immediately a 
door opened, the robbers passed in when the 
door shut of itself. In a short time the door 
opened again, and the robbers came out, who 
said, Shut Sesame.' The door instantly closed; 
AH Baba ventured down and approaching the 
rock said, ' Open Sesame.' Immediately the 
door flew open. He brought his asses, took as 
many bags of gold coin as they could carry. 

AH Baba, told his brother, the secret of the 
cave. Cassim rose early next morning, and set 




out with ten mules loaded with great chests. 
He fou.nd the rock and having said, Open Se- 
same,* gained admission, where he found more 
treasures than he expected. Which made him 
forget the word that caused the door to open. 
Presently he heard the sound of horse's feet, 
which he concluded to he the robbers; who in- 
stantly put him to death. Ali Baba drove to 
the forest and on entering the cave, he found 
the body of his brother cut into quarters. He 
took the quarters, and put them upon one of 
his asses. And delivered the body to Cassim's 
wife. Morgiana a female slave in his brother's 
house, was sent early next morning to a poor 




cobbler, and gave him two pieces of gold to go 
with her blindfolded, taking him into tlte room 
where the body was lying, bade him sew the 
mangled limbs together. Mustapha obeyed, 
having received two pieces of gold, and was 
led blindfolded the same way back. 

Cassim was buried with all due solemnity; 
and Ali Baba removed to the house of his de- 
ceased*brother, of which he took possession. 

The captain of the troop resolved to find out 
who possessed the secret of entrance into his 
cave, anchtlisguising himself went to the city 
^arly one morning, when accosting the cobbler, 
ke was told of the job he had, who for six 




pieces of gold, allowed himself to be blindfold- 
ed, and traced out the house of Cassim which 
the robber marketl with chalk. 

Buying nineteen mules and thirty -nine large 
jars, one full of oil, and the rest empty. The 
captain put a man into each jar, properly arm- 
ed, he then proceeded to the street where Ali 
Baba dwelt, "Sir" said he, I have brought this 
oil a great way to sell, as I am quite a stranger 
will you let me put my mules into your court 
yard, and direct me where I may lodge to- 
night?' 7 Ali Baba welcomed the pretenrde<l 
oil-merchant, offered him a bed in his own 
house, and invited his guest in to supper. 




Morgiana sitting up later that night than u- 
sual, her lamp went out; she took her oil pot 
in her hand, and approaching the first jar, the 
robber within said, " Is it time, captain?" she 
replied, t( No., not yet; so she ran back to the 
kitchen, and brought out a large kettle, which 
she filled with oil, set it on a great wood fire, 
and as soon as it boiled, she went and poured 
into the jars sufficient of the boiling oil to kill 
every man within. 

The captain of the robbers, arose to assem- 
ble his men. Coining to the first jar, he felt 
the steam of the boiled oil? he ran hastily to 
the rest, and found every one of his troop put 




to death. Full of rage, he forced the lock of 
the door and made his escape over the walls. 

Without letting any one into the secret, AH 
Baba, and Morgiana the next night buried the 
thirty-nine thieves at the bottom of the garden. 

The captain at length, however determined 
to adopt a new scheme for the destruction of 
Ali Baba. He removed all the valuable mer- 
chandise from the cave to the city, and took a 
shop exactly opposite to Ali Baba's house. Ali 
Baba's son went every day to his shop. The 
pretended Cogia Hassan, soon appeaerd to be 
very fond of Ali Baba's son, offered him many 
Dresents and often detained him to dinner. 




AH Baba thought it was necessary to make 
some return to these civilities, and he invited 
Cogia Hassan to supper; Morgiana carried in 
the first dish herself. The moment she looked 
at Cogia Hassan, she knew it was the pretend- 
ed oil-merchant. She sent the other slaves into 
the kitchen, and waited at table herself; and 
wlnJe Cogia Hassan was drinking, she perceiv- 
ed he had a dagger hid under his coat. She 
went away, and dressed herself in the habit of 
a dancing-girl. As soon as she appeared at 
the parlour door, her master, ordered her to 
oome in to entertain his guest with some of 
h*r best dancing. Morgiana danced several 

A BRISK young Cock, in company with two 
**- or three Pullets, his mistresses, raking upon 
a dunghill for something to entertain them with, 
happened to scratch up a jewel; he knew what 
it was well enough, for it sparkled with an exceeding 
bright lustre; but, not knowing what to do with it, 
endeavoured to cover his ignorance under a gay con- 
tempt. So, shrugging up his wings, shaking his 
head, and Cutting on a grimace, he expressed him- 
B 



2 JESOP'S FABLES. 

self to this purpose : Indeed, you are a very fine tiling ; 
but 1 know not any business you have here. I make 
no scruple of declaring that my taste lies quite another 
way; and I had rather have one grain of dear delicious 
barley, than all the jewels under the sun. 

THE APPLICATION. 

There are several people in the world, that pass, with 
some, for well-accomplished gentlemen, and very pretty 
fellows, though they are as great strangers to the true 
uses of virtue and knowledge, as the Cock upon the 
cjunghill is to the real value of the jewel. He palliates 
his ignorance, by pretending that his taste lies another 
way : but whatever gallant airs people may give them- 
selvesupon theseoccasions,withoutdispute, the solid ad- 
vantages of virtue, and the durable pleasures of learning, 
are as much to be preferred before other objects of the 
senses, as the finest brilliant diamond is above a barley- 
corn. , The greatest blockheads would appear to under- 
stand, what at the same time they affect to despise ; and 
nobody yet was ever so vicious,astohave the impudence 
to declare in public, that virtue was not a fine thing. 

But still among the idle, sauntering young fellows of 
the age, who have leisure, as well to cultivate and im- 
prove the faculties of the mind, as to dress and embellish 
the body ; how many are there, who spend their days in 
raking after new scenes of debauchery, in comparison of 
those few who know how to relish more reasonable enter- 
tainments! Honest, undesigning good sense is so un- 
fashionable, that he must be a bold man, who at this time 
of day attempts to bring it 'into esteem. 

How disappointed is the youth, who, in the midst of 
his amorous pursuits, endeavouring to plunder an out- 
side of bloorn and beauty, finds u treasure of impene- 
trable virtue concealed within ! And why may it not 
be said, how delighted are the fair sex, when, from 
among a crowd of empty, frolicsome, conceited admirers, 
they find out aud distinguish with their good opinion, a 
man of sense, with a plain, unafiected person, which, at 
first sight, they did not like. 



-ESOFS FABLES. 



FAB. II. The WOLF and the LAMB. 




/^JNE hot, sultry day, a Wolf and a Lamb happened 
*^ to come, just at the same time, to quench their 
thirst in the stream of a clear silver brook, that ran 
tumbling down the side of a rocky mountain. The 
Wolf stood upon the higher ground ; and the Lamb 
at some distance from him down the current. How- 
ever, the Wolf, having a mind to pick a quarrel with 
him, asked him, What he meant by disturbing the 
water, and making it so muddy that he could not 
drink ; and, at the same time demanded satisfaction. 
The Lamb, frightened at this threatening charge, told 
him, in a tone as mild as possible, That, with humble 
submission, he could not conceive how that could be ; 
since the water which he drank ran down from the 
Wolf to him, and therefore it could not be disturbed 
so far up the stream. Be that as it will, replies the 
Wolf, you are a rascal, and I have been told that you 
treated me with ill language behind my back, about 
Bs 



4 JESOPS FABLES. 

half a year ago. Upon my word says the Lamb, the time 
you mention was before I was born. The Wolf, find- 
ing it to no purpose to argue any longer against truth, 
fell into a great passion, snarling and foaming at the 
mouth, as if he had been mad ; and drawing nearer 
to the Lamb, Sirrah, says he, if it was not you it was 
your father, and that's all one. So he seized the poor, 
innocent, helpless thing, tore it to pieces, and made a 
meal of it. 

THE APPLICATION. 

The thing which is pointed at in this fable is so ob- 
vious, that it will be impertinent to multiply words about 
it. When a cruel, ill-natured man has a mind to abuse 
one inferior to himself, either in power or courage, 
though he has not given the least occasion for it, how 
does he resemble the Wolf! whose envious, rapacious 
temper could not bear to see innocence live quietly 
in its neighbourhood. In short, wherever ill people are 
in power, innocence and integrity are sure to be perse- 
cuted ; the more vicious the community is, the better 
countenance they have for their own villanous mea- 
sures : to practise honesty, in bad times, is being liable 
to suspicion enough ; but if any one should dare to pre- 
scribe it, it is ten to one but he would be impeached of 
high crimes and misdemeanors : for, to stand up for 
justice in a degenerate and corrupt state, is tacitly to 
upbraid the government ; and seldom fails of pulling 
down vengeance upon the head of him that ofters to stir 
in its defence. Where cruelty and malice are in com- 
bination with power, nothing is so easy as for them to 
find a pretence to tyrannize over innocence, and ex- 
ercise all manner of injustice, 



^E,SOP'S FABLES. 



FAB. III. The FROGS desiring a KING. 




r T 1 HE Frogs, living an easy free life, every where 
* among the lakes and ponds, assembled together, 
one day, in a very tumultuous manner, and peti- 
tioned Jupiter to let them have a king, who might 
inspect their morals, and make them live a little 
honester. Jupiter, being at that time in pretty 
good humour, was pleased to laugh heartily at their 
ridiculous request; and throwing a little log down 
into the pool, cried, There is a king for you! The 
sudden splash which this made by its fall into the 
water, at first terrified them so exceedingly, that 
they were afraid to come near it. But in a little 
time, seeing it lay still without moving, they ven- 
tured by degrees, to approach it; and at last, find- 
ing there was no danger, they leaped upon it ; and, 
in short, treated it as familiarly as they pleased. But 
not contented with so insipid a king as this was, 
they sent their deputies to petition again for another 



6 j-ESOP'S FABLES, 

sort of one ; for this they neither did nor could like. 
Upon .that, he sent them a Stork ; who, without any 
ceremony, fell devouring and eating them up, one after 
another, as fast as he could. Then they applied them- 
selves privately to Mercury, and got him to speak to 
Jupiter in their behalf, That he would be so good as 
to bless them again with another king, or restore them 
to their former state : No, says he, since it was their 
own choice, let ihe obstinate wretches suffer the pu- 
nishment due to their folly, 

THE APPLICATION. 

It is pretty extraordinary to find a fable of this kind, 
finished with so bold and yet polite a turn by Pbaedrus : 
one who attained his freedom by the favour of Au- 
gustus, and wrote it in the time of Tiberius; who were, 
successively, tyrannical usurpers of the Roman govern- 
ment. If we may take his word for it, j^Esop spoke 
it upon this occasion. When the commonwealth of 
Athens flourished under good wholesome laws of its own 
enacting, they relied so much upon the security of 
their liberty, that they negligently sufiered it to run 
out into licentiousness. And factions happening to be 
fomented among them by designing people, much about 
the same time, Pisistratus took that opportunity to make 
himself mastcrof theircitadel and liberties both together 
The Athenians finding themselves in a state of sla- 
very, though their tyrant happened to be a very mer- 
ciful one, yet could not bear the thoughts of it : so that 
^Esop, where there was no remedy, prescribes them to 
patience by the example of the foregoing fable : and 
adds, at last, " Wherefore, my dear countrymen, be con- 
tented with your present condition, bad as it is, for fear 
a change should be worse. " 



/ESOP'S FABLES. 
FA.B . IV. The vain J A c K-D A w. 




A CERTAIN Jack-Daw was so proud and ambi- 
J -*- tious, that, not contented to live within his own 
sphere, he picked up the feathers which fell from the 
Peacocks, stuck them among his own, and very con- 
fidently introduced himself into an assembly of those 
beautiful birds. They soon found him out, stripped 
him of his borrd^ved plumes, and falling upon him 
with their sharp bills, punished him as his 'presump- 
tion deserved. Upon this, full of grief and affliction, 
he returned to his old companions, and would have 
flocked with them again ; but they, knowing his late 
life and conversation, industriously avoided him, and 
refused to admit him into their company ; and one of 
them, at the same time, gave him this serious reproof. 
If, friend, you could have been contented with your 
station, and had not disdained the rank in which na- 
ture had placed you, you had not been used so scurvi- 
ly by those upon whom you introduced yourself, nor 
suffered the notorious slight which we now think our- 
selves obliged to put upon you. 



.SOFS FABLES. 



THE APPLICATION. 

What we may learn from this fable is, in the main, to 
live contentedly in our own condition, whatever it be, 
without affecting to look bigger than we are, by a false 
or borrowed light. To be barely pleased with appearing 
i.bove what a man really is, is" bad enough ; and what 
may justly render him contemptible in the eyes of his 
equals : But if, to enable him to do this with something 
of*. better grace, he has clandestinely feathered his nest 
with his neighbour's good?, when found out, he has no- 
thing to expect but to be stripped of his plunder, and 
used like a felonious rogue into the bargain. 

FAB, V. The DOG and the SHADOW. 







A DOG, crossing a little rivulet, with a piec<? of 
^*- flesh in his mouth, saw his own shadow re- 
presented in the clear mirror of the limpid stream ; 
and believing it to be another Dog, who was carry- 
ing another piece of flesh, lie could not forbear 
catching at it; but was so far from getting any 



AESOP'S FABLES. 9 

thing by his greedy design, that he dropt the piece he 
had in his mouth, which immediately sunk to the bot- 
tom; and was irrecoverably lost. 

THE APPLICATION. 

He that catches at more than belongs to him, justly 
deserves to lose what he has. Yet nothing is more 
common, at the same time more pernicious, than this 
selfish principle. It prevails, from the king to the pea- 
sant ; and all orders and degrees of men are, more or 
less, infected with it. Great monarchs have been drawn 
in, by this greedy humour, to grasp at the dominions 
of their neighbours ; not that they wanted any thing 
more to feed their luxury, but to gratify their insatiable, 
appetite for vain-glory. If the kings of Persia could 
have been contented with their own vast territories, 
they had not lost all Asia for the sake of a little petty 
state of Greece. And France, with all its glory, had, 
ere now, been reduced to the last extremity, by the same 
unjust encroachments. 

He that thinks he sees another's estate in a pack of 
cards, or a box and dice, and ventures his own in the 
pursuit of it, should not repine if he finds himself a 
beggar in the end. 



B5 



10 



AESOP'S FABLES. 



FAB. VI. The LION and other BEASTS. 




r pHE Lion, and several other beasts, entered into 
an alliance, offensive and defensive, and were to 
lie very sociably together in the forest ; one day having 
made a sort of an excursion, by way of hunting, they 
took a very line, large, fat Deer, which was divided in- 
to four parts ; there happening to be then present his 
Majesty the Lion, and only three others. After the 
division was made, and the parts were set out, his 
Majesty advancing forward some steps, and pointing 
to one of the shares, was pleased to declare himself 
after the following manner : This I seize and take pos- 
session of as my right, which devolves to me, as I am 
descended by a true, lineal, hereditary succession, from 
the royal family of Lion : that (pointing to the second) 
1 claim by, I think, no unreasonable demand ; con- 
sidering that all the engagements you have with the 
enemy turn chiefly upon my courage and conduct ; 



S FABLES. 31 

and you very well know, that wars are too expensive 
to be carried on without proper supplies. Then 
(nodding his head towards the third) that I shall take 
by Tirtue of my prerogative; to which, I make no 
question but so dutiful and loyal a people will pay all 
the deference and regard that I can desire. Now, as 
for the remaining part, the necessity of our present 
affairs is so very urgent, our stock so low, and our 
credit so impaired and weakened, that 1 must insist 
upon your granting that without any hesitation or de- 
mur; and hereof fail not at your peril. 

THE APPLICATION. 

No alliance is safe which is made with those that are 
superior to us in power. Though they lay themselves 
under the most strict and solemn ties at the opening of 
the congress, yet the first advantageous opportunity will 
tempt them to break the treaty ; and they will never 
want specious pretences to furnish out their declarations 
or' war. It is not easy to determine, whether it is more 
stupid and ridiculous for a community, to trust itself 
first in the hands of those that are more powerful than 
themselves, or to wonder afterwards that thei r confidence 
and credulity are abused, and their properties invaded. 



AESOP'S FABLES. 



FAB. VIL The WOLF and the CRANE. 




A WOLF, after devouring his prey, happened to 
J -*- have a bone stick in his throat,, which gave him 
so much pain, that he went howling up and down, 
and importuning every creature he met, to lend him a 
kind hand in order to his relief; nay, lie promised a 
reasonable reward to any one that should undertake 
the operation with success. At last the Crane, tempt- 
ed with the lucre of the reward, and having first pro- 
cured him to confirm his promise \vith an oath, under- 
took the business, and ventured his long neck into the 
japacious felon's throat. In short, he plucked out the 
bone, and expected the promised gratuity. When the 
Wolf, tinning his eyes disdainfully towards him, said, 
J did not think you had been so unconscionable ; I 
had your head in my mouth, and could have bit it oiT 
whenever I pleased, but suffered you to take it away 
without any damage, and yet you are not contented ! 



JES'OFS FABLES. 



1-3 



THE APPLICATION. 

There is a sort of people in the world, to whom a man 
may be in the wrong for doing service*, upon a double 
score ; first, because they never deserved to have a good 
office done them; and secondly, because, when once 
engaged, it is so hard a matter to get well rid of their 
acquaintance. 

This fable is not an example of ingratitude, ns at first 
sight it seems to bo, and as some- of the mythologists 
have understood it; to make a parallel in that case, the 
Crane ought to have been under some difficulties in his 
tarn, and the Wolf have refused to assist him when it 
was in hi* power. The whole stress of it lies in this, 
that we ought to consider what kind of people they are 
to whom we are desired to do good offices, before we do 
them ; for he that grants a favour, or even confides in a, 
person (f no honour, instead of finding his account in., 
it, comes off well if he is no sufferer. 

FAB. VIII. The STAG looking into the WATER, 




A STAG that had been drinking at a clear 
* spring, saw himself in the water; and, pleased; 
with the prospect, stood afterwards for some time 



1:4 ^ISOP'S FABLES. 

contemplating and surveying his shape and features, 
from head to foot. Ah ! says he, what a glorious pair 
of branching horns are there ! how gracefully do those 
antlers hang over my forehead, and give an agreeable 
turn to my whole face ! If some other parts of my 
body were but proportionable to them, I would 
turn my back to nobody ; but I have a set of such 
legs as really makes me ashamed to see them. 
People may talk what they please of their conveni- 
ences, and what great need we stand in of them, 
upon several occasions ; but, for my part, I find them 
so very slender and unsightly, that I had as lief have 
none at all. While he was giving himself these airs, 
he was alarmed with the noise of some huntsmen and 
a pack of hounds, that had been just laid on upon the 
scent, and were making towards him. Away he flies 
in some consternation, and, bounding nimbly over the 
plain, threw dogs and men at a vast distance behind 
him. After which, taking a very thick copse, he had 
the ill-fortune to be entangled by his horns in a thicket ; 
where he was held fast, till the hounds came in and 
pulled him down. Finding now how it was like to 
go with him, in the pangs of death, he is said to have 
uttered these words : Unhappy creature that I am ! I 
am too late convinced, that what I prided myself in, 
1ms been the cause of my undoing ; and what I so 
much disliked, was the only thing that could have 
saved me. 

THE APPLICATION. 

Perhaps we cannot apply this better, than by suppos- 
ing the fable<tobeapaiabie; which may be rhusexplain- 
ed. The Deer, viewing itself in the water, is a beautiful 
young lady at her looking-glass. She cannot help 
being sensible of the c harms which lie blooming in 
every feature of her face. She moistens her lips, lan- 
guishes with her eyes, adjusts every lock of her hair with 
the nicest exactness, gives an agreeable attitude to her 



FABLES. 15 

whole body ; and then, with a soft sigh, says to herself, 
Ah ! how happy might I be in a daily crowd of ad- 
mirers, if it were not for the eensoriousness of the age ! 
When I view that face, where nature, to give hex her 
due, has been liberal enough of charms, how easy should 
1 be if it were not for that slender particular my ho- 
nour. The odious idea of that comes across all my 
happy moments, and brings a mortification with it that 
damps my most flattering, tender hopes. Oh ! that tfyere 
were no such thing in the world I Jn the midst of these 
soliloquies, she is interrupted by the voice of her 
lover, who enters her chamber singing a rigadoon air j 
and, introducing his discourse in afamiliar easy manner, 
takes occasion to launch out in praise of her beauty, 
sees she is pleased with it, snatches her hand, kisses it 
in a transport; and in short, pursues his point so close, 
that she is not able to disengage herself from him. But, 
when the consequence of all this approaches, in an agony 
of grief and shame, she fetches a deep sigh, and says, 
Ah ! how mistaken have I been ! the virtue I slighted 
might have saved me; but the beauty I prized so much 
has been my undoing, 



1ft AESOP'S FABLES. 

FAB. IX. The Fox and the CROW. 




A CROW havir.g taken a piece of cheese out of 
^*- a cottage window, flew up into a high tree with 
it, in order to eat it; which the Fox observing, came 
and sat underneath, and began to compliment the Crow 
upon the subject of her beauty. 1 protest, says he, I 
never observed it before, but your feathers are of a more 
delicate white than any that ever I saw in my life ! Ah I: 
what a fine shape and graceful turn of body is there !; 
And I make no question but you have a tolerable voice. 
If it is but as fine as your complexion, I do not know a 
bird that can pretend to stand in competition with you. 
The Crow, tickled with this very civil language, nestled 
and riggled about, and hardly knew where she was ;. 
but, thinking the Fox a little dubious as to the parti- 
cular of her voice, and having a mind to set him right 
in that matter, began to sing, and, in the san. instant 
let the cheese drop out of her mouth. This being 
what the Fox wanted, he chopped it up in a moment; 
and trotted away, laughing to himself at the easy cre- 
dulity of the Crow. 



/ESOP'S FABLES, 17 

THF APPLICATION. 

They that love flattery (as it is to be feared, too 
many do) are in a fair way to repent of their foible at 
tbe long run. And yet how few are there, among the 
whole race of mankind, who may be said to be full 
proof against its attacks ! the gross way by which it is 
managed, by some silly practitioners, is enough to 
alarm the dullest apprehension, and make it to value 
itself upon the quickness of its insight into the little 
plots of this nature. But, let the ambuscade be dis- 
posed with dne judgment, and it will scarce fail of 
seizing the snost guarded heart. How many are tickled 
to the last degree with the pleasure of flattery, even 
while they are applauded for their honest detestation of 
it ! There is no way to baffle the force of this engine, 
but by every one's examining impartially for himself 
the true estimate of his own qualities : if he deals sin- 
cerely in the matter, nobody can tell, so well as himself, 
what degree of esteem ought to attend any of hi& ac-. 
lions ; and therefore he should be entirely easy, as to 
the opinion men are like to have of them in the world. 
If they attribute more to him than is his due, they are 
either designing or mistaken ; if they allow him less, 
they are envious, or possibly, still mistaken ; and, in 
either case, are to be despised, or disregarded. For he 
that flatters without designing to make advantage of it, 
is a fool : and whoever encourages that flattery which 
he has sense enough to see through, is a vain coxcomb. 



18 AESOP'S FABLES. 

FA B . X. The fzvo BITCHES. 




A BITCH, who was just ready to whelp, entreated 
-^*- another Bitch to lend her her kennel, only till her 
month was up, and assured her that then she should 
have it again. The other very readily consented, and, 
with a great deal of civility, resigned it to her im- 
mediately. However, when the time was elapsed, she 
came and made her a visit, and very modestly in- 
timated, that now she was up and well, she hoped she 
should see her abroad again ; for that really it would 
be inconvenient for her to be without her kennel any 
longer, and therefore she told her she must be so free 
as to desire her to provide herself with other lodgings 
as soon as she could. The lying-in Bitch replied, 
That truly she was ashamed of having kept her so 
long out of her own house; but it was not upon her 
own account, (for indeed she was well enough to go 
any where) so much as that of her Puppies, who \vere 
yet so weak, that she was afraid they would not be^ 



JESOFS FABLES. 19 

able to follow her; and, if she would but be so good 
as to let her stay a fortnight longer, .she would take 
it for the greatest obligation in the world. The other 
Bitch was so good-natured and compassionate as to 
comply with this request too ; but at the expiration of 
the term, came and told her positively that she must 
turn out, for she could not possibly let her be there 
a day longer. Must turn out says the other; we 
will see that; for I promise you, unless you can beat 
me and my whole litter of Whelps, you are never like 
to have any thing more to do here. 

THE APPLICATION. 

Possession is eleven points of the law ; and though, 
where equity flourishes, and property is duly secured, 
the twelfth point, I mean that of right, is better than 
the other eleven ; yet this fable may serve as a very good 
lesson of caution to us } never to let any thing we value 
go out of our possession without very good security. 
\Vise ami good-natured men will give liberally and ju- 
diciously what they can spare ; but to lend, where there 
is a probability of our being defrauded by the borrower, 
is the part of a too easy and blaraeable credulity. 



'S FABLES. 



FA B. XI. The proud FROG. 




A N Ox, grazing in a meadow: chanced to set his 
foot among a parcel of young Frogs, and trod 
one of them to death. The rest informed their mother 
when she came home, what had happened; telling 
her, that the beast which did it was the luigest crea- 
ture that they ever saw in their lives. What was it so 
big? says the old Frog, swelling and blowing up her 
speckled belly to a great degree. Oh ! bigger by a 
vast deal, say they. Awd so big ? says she, straining 
herself yet more. Indeed, Mamma, say they, if you 
\vere to burst yourself, you would never be so big. 
She strove yet again, and burst herself indeed. 

THE APPLICATION. 

Vf henevcr a man endeavours to live equal with one 
of a greater fortune than himself, he is sure to share a 
like fate with the Frog in the fable. How many vain 
people, of moderate easy circumstances, burst and come 



JESOP'S FABLES. 21 

to nothing, by vying with those whose estates are more 
ample than their own! Sir Changeling Plurastock was 
possessed of a very Considerable estate, devolved to him 
by the death of an uncle, \vho had adopted him his 
heir. He had a false taste of happiness ; and, without 
the least economy, trusting to the sufficiency of his 
vast revenue, was resolved to be outdone by nobody in 
sbowish grandeur and expensive living. He gave five 
thousand pounds for a piece of ground in the country, 
to set a house upon; the building and furniture of 
which cost fifty thousand more; and his gardens were 
proportionably magnificent. Beside which, he thought 
himself under a necessity of buying out two or three 
tenements which stood in his neighbourhood, that he 
might have elbow-room enough. All this he could 
very well bear, and still might have been happy, 
had it not have been for an unfortunate view which 
he one day happened to take of my Lord Castle- 
builder's gardens, which consisted of twenty acres, 
whereas his own were not above twelve. From that 
time he grew pensive ; and before the ensuing winter 
gave five-and-thirty years purchase for a dozen acres 
more, to enlarge his gardens, built a couple of exhor- 
bitant green-houses, and a large pavilion at the farther 
end of a terrace-walk : the bare repairs and superinten- 
dances of all w hich called for the remaining part of his 
income. He is mortgaged pretty deep, and pays no- 
body : but being a privileged person, resides altogether 
at a private cheap lodging in the city of Wesemister, 



AESOP'S FABLES. 



FAH. XII. The Fox and the STORK. 




nPITE Fox invited the Stork to dinner; and, being 
** disposed to divert himself at the expence of his 
guest, provided nothing for the entertainment, but a 
soirp, in a wide shallow dish. This himself could lap 
up with a great deal of ease, but the Stork, who could 
but just dip in the point of his bill, was not a bit the 
better all the while : howevei, in a few days after, he 
returned the compliment, and invited the Fox ; but 
suffered nothing to be brought to table but some 
minced meat in a glass jar; the neck of which was so 
deep and so narrow, that though the Stork with his 
long bill made a shift to fill his belly, all that the Fox, 
who was very hungry, could do, was to lick the brims, 
as the Stork slabbered them with his eating. Reynard 
was heartily vexed at first : but when he came to take 
his leave, owned ingenuously, that he had been used 
as he deserved ; and that he had no reason to take any 
treatment ill, of which himself had set the example. 



AESOP'S FABLES. 



THE APPLICATION". 

'It i.s mighty imprudent, as well as inhuman and uncivil, 
to affront any body; and whoever takes the liberty to ex- 
ercise his witty talents that way, must not think much ot' 
it, if he meets with reprisals. Indeed, if all those uho are 
thus paid in their own coin, would take it with the same 
frankness the Fox did, the maiter would not be much; but, 
we are too apt, when the jest comes to be turned home 
upon ourselves, to think that insufferable in another, 
which we looked upon as pretty and facetious, when the 
humour was our own. The rule of doing as we would be 
done by, so proper to be our model in every transaction 
of life, may more particularly be of use in this respect : 
because people seldom or never receive any advantage 
by these little ludicrous impositions, and yet, if they 
were to ask themselves the question, would find, that 
another's using them in the same manner would be very 
displeasing. 

FAB. XIII. The EAGLE and the Fox. 




AN Eagle that had young ones, looking out for 
something to feed them with, happened to spy a 
Fox's Cub, that lay basking itself abroad in the sun. 



C4 JESOP'S FABLES. 

She made a stoop, and trussed it immediately ; but 
before she had carried it quite oft', the old Fox com- 
ing home, implored her, with tears in her eyes, to 
spare lier cub, and pity the distress of a poor fond 
mother, who should think no affliction so great as that 
of losing her child. The Eagle, whose nest was up 
in- a very high tree, thought herself secure enough 
from all projects of revenge, and so bore away the 
cub to her young ones, without showing any regard to 
the supplication of the Fox. But that subtle crea- 
ture, highly incensed at this outrageous barbarity, ran 
to an altar, were some country people had been sa- 
crificing a kid in the open fields, and, catching up a 
firebrand in her mouth, made towards the tree where 
the Eagle's nest was, with a resolution of revenge. 
She had scarce ascended the first branches, when the 
Eagle, terrified with the approaching ruin of herself 
aud family, begged of the Fox to desist, and, with 
much submission, returned her the cub again safe and 
sound. 

THE APPLICATION. 

This fable is a warning to us not to deal hardly or in- 
juriously by any body. The consideration of our being 
in a high condition of life, and those we hurt far below 
us, will plead little or no excuse for us in this case. 
For there is scarce a creature of so despicable a rank, 
but is capable of avenging itself some way, and at some 
time, or other. When great men happen to be wicked, 
how little scruple do they make of oppressing their 
poor neighbours! they are-perched upon a lofty station, 
*nd have built their nest on high ; and, having out- 
grown all feelings of humanity, are insensible of any 
pangs of remorse. The widow's tears, the orphan's 
cries, and the curses of the miserable, like javelins 
thrown by the hand of a feeble old man, fall by the 
way, and never reach their heart. But let such a one, 
in the midst of his flagrant injustice, remember, how 
easy a matter it is, notwithstanding his superior dis- 



/SOPS FABLES. 25 

stance, for the meanest vassal to be revenged of him. 
The bitterness of an affliction, even where cunning is 
wanting, may animate the poorest spirit wiih resolutions 
of vengeance; and when once that fury is thoroughly 
awakened, we know not what she will require before 
she is lulled to rest again. The most powerful tyrants 
cannot prevent a resolved assassination; there are a thou- 
sand different ways for any private man to do the busi- 
ness, who is heartily disposed to it, and wil ling to satisfy 
his appetite for revenge, at the expence of his life. An 
old woman may clap a firebrand in the palace of a prince, 
and it is in the power of a poor weak fool to destroy the 
children of the mighty. 



FAB. XIV. The BOAR and the Ass. 




A LITTLE scoundrel of an Ass, happening to 
*& meet with a boar, had a mind to be arch upon 
him : And so, brother, says he, your humble servant. 
The Boar, somewhat nettled at his familiarity, 
bristled up to him, and told him, he was surprised to 
hear him utter so impudent an untruth, and was 
C 



6 AESOP'S FABLES. 

just going to show his noble resentment, by giving him 
a rip in the flank ; but wisely stifling his passion, he 
contented himself, with only saying, Go, you sorry 
beast, I could be amply and easily revenged of you, 
but I don't care to foul my tusks with tht blood of 
so base a creature. 



THE APPLICATION. 

Fools are sometimes so ambitious of being thought 
wits, that they run great hazards in attempting to show 
themselves such. This is not the first Ass, who, after a 
handsome rebuke from one superior to himself, both in 
courage and merit, has continued his awkward raillery 
even to the last degree of oftence. But such a dull crea- 
ture is so far from raising himself the least esteem by his 
ludicrous vein, that he has very good luck if he escapes 
with a whole skin. Buftbous, like dwarfs, should be 
matched with those of their own level; a man, in sense 
or stature, would be ashamed to encounter either of 
them. But, notwithstanding all this, and though the 
Boar in the fable ?s a very good -example to men of ge- 
nerous brave spirits, not to give themselves up to passion, 
nor to be distempered with thoughts of revenge upon 
the insolent behaviour of every ass that offends them, 
because their hands would be dishonoured by the tinc- 
ture of a base man's blood ; yet, among human crea- 
tures, the correction of an ass that would be unseasonably 
witty, may be performed with justness and propriety 
enough, provided it be done with good humour. The 
blood of a coward, literally spealting, would stain the 
character of a man of honour; when we chastise such 
wretches, it should be done, if possible in the utmost 
calmness of temper. It takes off" something from the 
reputation of a great soul, when we see it is in the 
power of a fool to ruffle and unsettle it. 



.ESOP'S FABLES. 27 

FAB. XV. The FKOGS and the fighting BULLS. 




A FROG, one day, peeping out of the lake, and 
*"* looking about him, saw two Bulls fighting at 
some distance oft in the meadow, and, calling to one 
of his acquaintance, Look, says she, what dreadful work 
is yonder ! Dear Sirs, what will become of us ? Why, 
pray thee, says the other, do not frighten yourself so 
about nothing; how can their quarrels affect us! They 
are of a different kind and way of living, and are at 
present only contending which shall be master of the 
herd. That is true, replies the first, their quality and 
station in life is, to all appearance, different enough 
from ours: but, as one of them will certainly get the 
better, he that is worsted, being beat out of the mea- 
dow, will take refuge here in the marshes, and may 
possibly tread out die guts of some of us: so you sec 
we are more nearly concerned in this dispute of theirs 
than at first vou were aware of. 
C 2 



28 JESOP'S FABLES. 



THE APPLICATION. 

This poor timorous frog had just reason for its fears 
and suspicions ; it being hardly possible for great peo- 
ple to fall out, without involving many below them in 
the same fate ; nay, whatever becomes of the former, 
the latter are sure to sutler ; those may be only playing 
the fool, while these really smart for it. 

It is of no small importance to the honest, quiet part 
of mankind, who desire nothing so much as to see peace 
and virtue flourish, to enter seriously and impartially 
into the consideration of this paint : for, as significant 
as the quarrels of the great may sometimes be, yet they 
are nothing without their espousingand supporting them, 
one way or other. What is it that occasiops parties, 
but the ambitious or avaricious spirit of men in eminent 
stations, who want to engross all power in their own 
hands? Upon this they foment divisions, and form fac- 
tions, and excite animosities between well-meaning, but 
undiscerning people, who little think that the great aim 
of their leaders is no more than the advancement of 
their private self-interest. The good of the public is 
always pretended upon such occasions, and may some- 
times happen to be tacked to their own ; but then it is 
purely accidental,, and never was originally intended. 
One knows not what remedy to prescribe against so epi- 
demical and frequent a malady, but only thatevery man 
who has sense enough to discern the pitiful private 
views that attend most of the differences between the 
great ones, instead of aiding and abetting either party, 
would, with an honest courage, heartily and openly op- 
pose both. 



.ESOP'S FABLES. 9 

FAB. XVI. The KITE and the PIGEONS. 




A KITE, who had kept sailing in the air for many 
days near a dove-house, and made a stoop at 
several Pigeons, but all to no purpose, (for they were 
too nimble for him) at last had recourse to stratagem, 
and took his opportunity one day to make a deqlara- 
tion to them, in which he set forth his own just and 
good intentions, who had nothing more at heart than 
the defence and protection of the Pigeons in their an- 
cient rights and liberties; and how concerned he was 
at their fears and jealousies of a foreign invasion, espe- 
cially their unjust and unreasonable suspicions of him- 
self, as if he intended, by force of arms, to break in 
upon their constitution, and erect a tyranieal govern- 
ment ove'r them. To prevent all which, and tho- 
roughly to quiet their minds, he thought proper to 
propose to them such terms of alliance and articles of 
peace, as might for ever cement a good understanding 
betwixt them: the principal of which was, that they 



30 JESOP'S FABLES. 

should accept of him for their king, and invest him, 
with all kingly privilege and prerogative over them. 
The poor simple Pigeons consented ; the Kite took 
the coronation oath after a very solemn manner, on 
his part, and the Doves, the oaths of allegiance and 
fidelity, on theirs. But much time had not passed 
over their heads, before the good Kite pretended that 
it was part of his prerogative to devour a Pigeon when- 
ever he pleased. And this he was not contented to 
do himself only, but instructed the rest of the royal 
family in the same kingly arts of government. The 
Pigeons, reduced to this miserable condition, said, OHB 
to the other, Ah i we deserve no better! Why did 
we let him come in ? 



THE APPLICATION. 

What can this fable be applied to, but the exceeding 
blindness and stupidity of that part of mankind, Mho 
wantonly and foolishly trust their native rights and li- 
berty without good security? Who often chuse for guar- 
dians of their lives and fortunes, persons abandoned to 
the most unsociable vices ; and seldom have any better 
excuse for such an error in politics, than, that they were 
deceived in their expectation ; or never thoroughly 
knew the manners of their king, till he had got them 
entirely in his power. Which, however, is notoriously 
fetse ; for many, with the Dovesin thefable, aresosilly, 
that they would admitof a Kite, rather than be without 
a king. The truth is, we ought not to incur the possi- 
bility of being deceived in so important a matter as this ; 
an unlimited power should not be trusted in the hands 
of any one, who is not endued with a perfection more 
than human. 



AESOP'S FABLES. Si 

FAB. XVII. The MAN and his two WIVES. 




A MAN, in times when polygamy was allowed, had 
* two wives: one of which, like himself, had seen 
her best days, and was just as it were entering upon 
the declivity of life; but this, beirg an artful woman, 
she entirely concealed by her dress; by which, and 
some other elegant qualities, she made a shift some- 
times to engage her husband's heart. The other was 
a beautiful young creature of seventeen, whose charms, 
as yet in the height of bloom, and secure of their own 
power, had no occasion to call in any artifice to their 
assistance. She made the good man as happy as he 
was capable of being, but was not, it seems, com- 
pletely so herself: the grey hairs, mixed among the 
black, upon her husband s head, gave her some unea- 
siness, by proclaiming the great disparity of their years; 
wherefore, under colour of adjusting and combing his 
head, she would every now and then be twitching the 
silver hairs with her nippers; that, however matters 



'S FABLES. 

were, lie might still have as few visible signs of an ad- 
vanced age as possible: the dame, whose years were 
nearer to an equality with his own, esteemed those 
grey locks as the honours of his head, and could have 
wished they had all been such ; she thought it gave 
him a venerable look; at least, that it made her ap- 
pear something younger than he : so that every time 
the honest man's head fell into her hands, she took as 
much pains to extirpate the black hairs^ as the other 
had done to demolish the grey. They neither of them 
knew of the other's design; but each continuing her 
project with repeated industry, the poor man, who 
thought their desire to oblige put them upon this ex- 
traordinary officiousness in dressing his head, found 
himself, in a short time, withont any hair at all. 

THE APPLICATION. 

Phaedrus, whose sense I have generally followed in 
every fable of which he has made a version, in his ap- 
plication of this, is a little severe upon the ladies; and 
tells us, that by this example we may see, the men are 
sure to be losers by the women j as well when they are 
the objects of their love, as while they lie under their 
displeasure. All that I shall add to what he has said, 
is to observe, that many women may unfortunately, out 
of a pure effect of complaisance, do a thousand disagree- 
able things to their husbands. They, whose love is 
tempered with a good share of good sense, will be 
sure to have no separate views of their own, nor do any 
thing more immediately relating to their husband, with- 
out consulting him first. In a married state, one party 
should inform themselves certainly, and not be guessing 
and presuming what will please the other; and if a wife 
uses her husband like a friend only, the least she can do, 
is first to communicate to him all the important entt r- 
prises she undertakes; and especially those \\hich she 
intends should be for his honour and advantage. 



JESOP'S FABLES. 2 

FAB. XVIII. The STAG in the OX-STALL. 




4 STAG, roused out of his thick covert in the midst 
of the forest, and driven hard by the hounds, 
made towards a farm-house, and seeing the door of 
an ox-stall open, entered therein, and hid himself un- 
der a heap of straw. One of the oxen, turning his 
head about, asked him what he meant by ventur- 
ing himself in such a place as that was, -where 
he was sure to meet with his doom ! Ah ! says 
the Stag, if you will but be so good as to favour 
me with your concealment, I hope I shall do well 
enough; I intend to make off again the first oppor- 
tunity. Well, he staid there till towards night: iu 
came the ox-man with a bundle of fodder, and never 
saw him. la short, all the servants of the farm came 
and went, and not a soul of them smelt any tiling of 
the matter. Nay, the bailiff himself came, according 
to form, and looked in, but walked away, no wiser 
than the rest. Upon this, the Stag, ready to jump out 
C5 



34 JESOP'S FABLES. 

of his skin for joy, began to return thanks to the good- 
natured Oxen, protesting that they were ihe most obi ig- 
ing people he had ever met with in his life. After he 
had done his compliments, one of them answered him 
gravely: Indeed we desire nothing more than to have 
it in our power to contribute to your escape; but there 
is a certain person, you little think of, who has a hun- 
dred eyes; if he should happen to come, I would not 
give this straw for your life. In the interim, home 
comes the master himself, from a neighbour's where 
he had been invited to dinner : and, because he had 
observed the cattle to look but scurvily of late, he 
went up to the rack, and asked why they did not give 
them more fodder; then, casting his eyes downward, 
Hey-dey ! says he, why so sparing of your litter? pray, 
scatter a little more here. And these cobwebs But 
I have spoken so often, that unless I do it myself 
Thus, as he went on, prying into every thing, he chanced 
to look where the Stag's horns lay sticking out of the 
straw; upon which he raised a hue-and-cry, called all 
his people about him, killed the poor Stag, and made 
a prize of him. 

THE APPLICATION. 

The moral of this fable is, that nobody looks after a 
man's affairs so well as he himself. Servants being but 
hirelings, seldom have the true interest of their masterat 
heart, but let things run on in a negligent constant dis- 
order; and this, generally, not so much for want of capa- 
city as honesty. Their heads are taken up with the 
cultivation of their own private interest; for the service 
and promotion of which, that of their master is post- 
poned, and often entirely neglected. 

Fe\v families are reduced to poverty and distress merely 
by their own extravagance and indulgence in luxury ! 
the inattention of servants swells every article of ex- 
pence in domestic economy ; and the retinue of great 
men, instead of exerting their industry to conduce a 



JESOP'S FABLES. 35 

far as possible to the increase of their master's wealth, 
commonly exercise no other office than that of locusts 
and caterpillars, to consume and devour it. 



FAB XIX. The DOG and the WOLP. 




\ LEAN, hungry, half-starved Wolf happened, one 
" moon-shiny night, to meet with a jolly, plump, 
well-fed Mastiff: and, after the first compliments were 
passed, says the Wolf, You look extremely well; I'pro- 
test, I think I never saw a more graceful, comely per- 
son ; but how conies it about, I b'esrech you, that you 
should live so much better than 1 ? I may say without 
vanity, that I venture fifty times more than you do; and 
yet I am almost ready to perish' with hunger. The 
Dog answered very bluntly, Why, you may live as 
well, if you will do the same for it that I do. In- 
deed! What is that: says he: Why, says the Dog, 
only to guard the house a-nights ; and keep it from. 



36 #1SOFS FABLES. 

thieves. With all my heart, replies the Wolf; for at 
present I have but a sorry time of it ; and I think to 
change my hard lodging in the woods, where I en- 
dure rain, frost, and snow, for a warm roof over my 
head ; and a belly-full of good victuals will be no bad 
bargain. True, said the Dog; therefore you have 
nothing more to do than to follow me. Now, as 
they were jogging on together, the Wolf spied a crease 
in the Dog's neck, and, having a strange curiosity, 
could not fobear asking him what it meant ! Pugh ! 
nothing, says the Dog. Nay, but pray, says the 
Wolf. Why, says the Dog, if you must know, I 
am tied up in the day-time, because I am a little 
fierce, for fear I should bite people, and am only 
let loose a-nights. But this is done with design to 
make me sleep a-days, more than any thing else, and 
that I may watch the better in the night-tiine; for, as 
soon as ever the twilight appears, out I am turned, and 
may go where I please. Then my master brings me 
plates of bones from the table with his own hands ; 
and, whatever scraps are left by any of the family, all 
fall to my share ; for you must know I am a favourite 
with every body. So you see how you are to live. 
Come, come along; what is the matter with you? No, 
replied the Wolf, I beg your pardon ; keep your hap- 
piness all to yourself. Liberty is the word with me ; 
and I would not be a king upon the terms you men- 
tion. 



THE APPLICATION. 

The lowest condition of life, with freedom attending 
it, is better than the mosi exalted station under a restraint. 
JEsop and Phaedrus, who h*d both felt the bitter effects 
of sla\eiy, though the latter of them had the good 
fortune to have the mildest prince tlrat ever was for his 
master, cannot forbear taking all opportunities! express 
their great abhorrence of serritude, and their passion 



FABLES. 



37 



for liberty, upon any terms whatsoever. Indeed a state 
of slavery, with whatever seeming grandeur and happi- 
ness it may beattended, is yet so precarious a thing, that 
he must want sense, honour, courage, and all manner of 
virtue, who can endure to prefer it in his choice. A 
man who has so little honour as to bear to be a slave, 
when it is in his power to prevent or redress it, would 
make no scruple to cut the throats of his fellow-creatures, 
or to do any wickedness that the wanton unbridled will 
of his tyrannical master could suggest. 



FAB. XX. The LAMB brought up by a GOAT. 




A WOLF meeting a Lamb one day, in com- 
-*- pany with a Goat ; Child, says he, you are mis- 
taken, this is none of your mother, she is yonder, 
(pointing to a flock of sheep at a distance.) It may 
be so r says the Lamb ; the person that happened to 
conceive me, and afterwards bore. me a few months in 
her belly, because she could not help it, and then 
dropt me, she did not care where, and left me to the 



33 ^SOP'S FABLES. 

wide world ; is, I suppose, what you call my mother ; 
but I look upon this charitable Goat as such, that* 
took compassion on me in my poor, helpless, desti- 
tute condition, and gave me suck ; sparing it out of 
the mouths of her own Kids, rather than I should 
want it. But sure, says he, you have a greater re- 
gard for her that &ave you life, than for any body else. 
She gave me life ! I deny that.. She, that could not 
so much as tell whether 1 should be black or white, 
had a great hand in giving me life to be sure; but; 
supposing it were so, 1 am mightily obliged to her 
truly for contriving to let me be of 'the male-kind, so 
that 1 go every day in dauber of the butcher. What 
reason then have I to have a greater regard for one to 
whom I am so little indebted for any part- of my 
being, than for those from whom I have received all 
the benevolence and kindness which have hitherto sup- 
ported me in life*. 



T1IE APPLICATION. 

It is they whose goodness makes them our parents, 
that properly claim our filial respect from us, and not 
those who are such only out of necessity. The duties 
between parents and their children are relative and re- 
ciprocal. By all laws, natural as well as civil, it is ex- 
pected that the parents should cherish and provide for 
the child, till it is able to shift for itself; and that the 
child, with a mutual tenderness, should depend upon 
the parent for ii's sustenance, and yield it a. reasonable 
obedience. Yet, through the depravity of human na- 
ture, we very .often see these laws violated, andthe rela- 
tions be fore-men tio tied t rent ingone another with' as much 
virulence as enemies of different countries are capable 
of. Through the natural impatience and protervity of 
youth, we observe the irrst occasion for any animosity 
most frequently arising from their side : but, however, 
there are not wanting examples of undutitjul parents : 



^ESOP'S FABLES. s<> 

and, when a father, by using a son ill, and denying 
him such an education and such an allowance as his 
circumstances can well afford, gives him occasion to 
withdraw his respect from him, to urge his begetting of 
him as the sole obligation to duty, is talking like a silly* 
unthinking dotard. Mutual benevolence must be kept 
up between relations, as well as friends ; for, without this 
cement, whatever you please to call the building, it is 
only a castle in the air, a thing to be talked of, without 
the least reality. 



FAB. XXL The PEACOCK'S Complaint. 




r | ^HE Peacock presented a memorial to Juno, im-- 
-* porting, how hardly he thought he was used, in 
not having so good a voice as the Nightingale: how 
that pretty animal was agreeable to every ear that: 
heard it, while he was laughed at for his ugly scream- 
ing noise, if be did but open his mouth. The God- 
dess, concerned at the uneasiness of her favourite 
bird, answered him very kindly to this purpose: If 
the Nightingale is blest with a fine voice, you have 



40 AESOP'S FABLES. 

the advantage in point of beauty and largeness of per 
son. Ahl says he. but what avails my silent unmean- 
ing beauty, when I am so far excelled in voice ! The 
Goddess dismissed him, bidding him consider, that 
the properties of every creature were appointed by 
the decree of fate ; to him beauty ; strength to the 
Eagle ; to the Nightingale a voice of melody ; the fa- 
culty of speech to the Parrot; and to the Dove inno- 
cence. That each of these was contented with his 
own peculiar quality : and, unless he had a mind to 
be miserable, he must learn to be so too. 

THE APPLICATION. 

Since all things (as Juno says) are fixed by the eternal 
and unalterable decree of fate, how absurd it is to hear 
people complaining and tormenting themselves for that 
which it is impossible ever to obtain ? They who are 
ambitious of having more good qualities, since that is 
impracticable, should spare no pains to cultivate and 
recommend those they have ; which, a sourness and 
peevishness of temper, instead of improving, will cer- 
tainly kssen and impair, whether they are of the mind 
or body. If we had all the desirable properties in the 
world, we could be no more than easy and contented 
with them ; and if a man, by a right way of thinking, 
can reconcile himself to his own condition, whatever it 
be, he will fall little short of the most complete state that 
mortals ever enjoyed- 



FABLES. 41 

FAB. XXII. The Fox and the GRAPES. 




A Fox, very hungry, chanced to come into a 
*"*- vineyard, where there hung branches of charming 
ripe Grapes : but nailed up to a trellis so high, that 
he leaped till he quite tired himself, without being 
able to reach one of them. At last, Let who will 
take them ! says he ; they are but green and sour ; so 
I'll even let them alcrce. 

THE APPLICATION. 

This fable is a good reprimand to a parcel of vain 
coxcombs in the world, who, because they would never 
be thought to be disappointed in any of their pursuits/ 
pretend a dislike to every thing which they cannot ob- 
tain. There is a strange propensity in mankind to this 
temper, and there are numbers of grumbling malcon- 
tents in every different faculty and sect in life. The 
discarded statesman, considering the corruption of the 
times, would not have any hand in the administration of 
affairs for all the world. The country 'squire damns a 



42 AESOP'S FABLES. 

court life, and would not go cringing and creeping 
to a drawing-room for the best place the king has 
in his disposal. A young fellow being asked how he 
liked a celebrated beauty, by whom all the world 
knew he was despised, answered, She had a stinking 
breath. How insufferable is the pride of this poor 
creature, man ! who would stoop to the basest, vilest 
actions, rather than be thought not able to do any thing. 
For what is more base and vile than lying? And when do 
we lie more notoriously, than when we disparage and 
find fault with a thing for no other reason but because 
it is cut of our power ? 



FAB. XXIII. The VIPER and the FILE. 




A VIPER entering a smith's shop, looked up and 
down for something to eat; and, seeing a File, 
fell to gnawing it as greedily as could be. The File 
told him, very gruffly, That he had best be quiet and 
let him alone ; for he would get very little by nib- 
bling at one, who, upon occasion, could bite iron and; 
steel. 



AESOP'S FABLES. 43 

THE APPLICATION. 

By this fable we are cautioned to consider what any 
person is, before we make an attack upon him, after any 
manner whatsoever : particularly how we let our tongues 
slip in censuring the actions of those who are, in the 
opinion of the world, not only of an unquestioned repu- 
tation, so that nobody will believe what we insinuate 
against them ; but of such an influence, upon account 
of their own veracity, that the least word from them 
would ruin our credit to all intents and purposes. If 
wit be the case, and we have a satirical vein, which, at 
certain periods must have a flow, let us be cautious at 
whom we level itj for, it' the person's understanding be 
of better proof than our own, all our ingenious sallies, 
like liquor squirted against the wind, will recoil back 
upon our own faces, and make us the ridicule of every 
spectator. This fable, besides, is not an improper em- 
blem of envy ; which, rather than not bite at all, will 
fall foul where it can hurt nothing but itself. 



44 AESOP'S FABLES. 

FAB. XXIV. The Fox and the-GoAT. 




A Fox having tumbled, by chance, into a well, 
** had been casting about a long while, to no pur- 
pose, how he should get out again ; when, at last, a 
Goat came to the place, and wanting, to drink, asked 
Reynard, Whether the water was good ! Good ! says 
he ; ay, so sweet, that I am afraid I have surfeited 
myself, I have drunk so abundantly. The Goat, upon 
this, without any more ado, leapt in ; and the Fox, 
taking the advantage of his horns, by the assistance of 
them, as nimbly leapt out, leaving the poor Goat at 
the bottom of the well, to shift for himself. 

THE APPLICATION. 

The doctrine taught us by this fable is no more than 
this, that we ought to consider who it is that advises us, 
before we follow the advice. For, however plausible 
the counsel may seem, if the person that gives it is a 
crafty knave, we may be assured that he intends to serve 
himself in it, more than us, if not to erect something to 
his own advantage out of our ruin. 



FABLES. 



The little, poor, country attorney, ready to perish, 
and sunk to the lowest depth 'of poverty, for want of 
employment, by such arts as these, draws the 'squire, 
his neighbour, into the gulph of the law ; till, laying 
hold oa the branches of his revenue, he lifts himself 
out of obscurity, and leaves the other immured in the 
bottom of a mortgage. 



FAB. XXV. The COUNTRY MAN and Me SNAKE. 




A VILLAGER, in a frosty, snowy winter, found a 
*- Snake under a hedge, almost dead with cold. 
He could not help having compassion for the poor 
creature, so brought it home, and laid it upon the 
hearth near the fire : but it had not lain there long, 
before (being revived with the heat) it began to erect 
itself, and fly at his wife and children, filling the whole 
cottage with dreadful hissings. The Countryman 
hearing an outcry, and perceiving what the matter 
was, catched up a mattock, and soon dispatched him, 
upbraiding him at the same time in these words : Is 



46 JESOP'S FABLES. 

this vile wretch, the reward you make to him that 
saved your life ? Die, as you deserve ; but a single 
death is too good for you. 

THE APPLICATION. 

It is the nature of ingrates to return evil for good : 
and the moralists in all ages have incessantly declaimed 
against the enormity of this crime, concluding that 
they who are capable of hurting their benefactors, are 
not fit to live in a community; being such, as the na- 
tural ties of parent, friend, or country, are too weak 
to restrain within the bounds of society. Indeed, the 
sin of ingratitude is so detestable, that, as none but the 
most inhuman temper can be guilty of it, so, in writing 
to men, there is no occasion to use many words, either 
in exposing the vice itself, or dissuading people from the 
commission of it. Therefore it is not likely that a 
person of JEsop's sagacity would have compiled this 
fable, without having something else in view, besides 
this trite and obvious subject. He certainly intended 
to put us in mind, that as none but a poor siiiy clown 
would go to take up a Snake and cherish it, so we shall 
be very negligent and ill-advised, if, in doing good 
offices, we do not take care to bestow our benevolence 
upon proper objects. It was not at all unnatural in the 
Snake to hiss, and brandish his tongue, and fly at the 
first that came near him ; as soon at the person that saved 
his life as any other; indeed more likely, because no- 
body else had so much to do with him. IN or is it strange 
al any time to see a reprobate fool throwing his poi- 
gonous language about,and committing hisextiavagan- 
cies against those, more especially,who are so inadvertent 
a to concern themselves with him. The Snake and the 
reprobate will not appear extraordinary in theu- male- 
volence : but the sensible part of mankind cannot help 
thinking those guilty of great indiscretion, who receive 
either of them into their protection. 



FABLES. 47 

FAB. XXVI. The MOUNTAINS in LABOUR. 




HHHE Mountains were said to be in labour, and 
uttered most dreadful groans. People came to- 
gether, far and near, to see what birth would be pro- 
duced ; and after they had waited a considerable time 
in expectation, out crept a Mouse. 

THE APPLICATION. 

Great cry and little wool is the English proverb ; the 
sense of which bears an exact proportion to this fable. 
By which arc exposed, alt those who promise something 
exceeding great, but come off with a production ridicu- 
lously little. Projectors of ail kinds, who endeavour bv 
artificial rumours to raise the expectations of man- 
kind, and then, by their mean performances, defeat and 
disappoint them, have, time out of mind, been IP i^ 
with the recital of this fable. How agreeably sur- 
prising is it to see an unpromising favourite, whom the 
caprice of fortune has placed at the helm of state, 



13 AESOP'S FABLES. 

serving the commonwealth with justice and integrity, 
instead of smothering and embezzling the public trea- 
sure to his own private and wkkedends ! And, on the 
contrary, how melancholy, how dreadful, or rather, how 
exasperating and provoking a sight is it, to behold one 
whose constant declarations for liberty and the public 
good, have raised people's expectations of him to the 
highest pitch, as soon as he is got into power, exerting 
his whole art and cunning to ruin and enslave his 
country ! The sanguine hopes of all those that wished 
well to virtue, and flattered themselves with a reforma- 
tion of every thing that opposed the well-being of the 
community > vanish away in smoke, and are lost in a dark, 
gloomy, uncomfortable prospect. 



FAB. XXVII. The ANT and the FLY. 




/^VNE day there happened some words between the 

Ant and the Fly about precedency, and the point 

\yas argued with great warmth and eagerness on both 

sides. Says the Fly, It is well known what my pre- 



JESOP'S FABLES. 49 

tensions are, and how justly they are grounded j^there 
is never a sacrifice that is offered, but I always taste 
of the entrails, even before the Gods themselves. I 
have one of the uppermost seats at church, and fre- 
quent the altar as often as any body : I have a free 
admission at court; and can never want the king's 
car, for 1 sometimes sit upon his shoulders. There is 
not a maid of honour, or handsome young creature 
comes in my way, but if I like her, I settle betwixt 
her balmy lips. And then I eat and drink the best of 
every thing, without having any occasion to work for my 
living. What is there that such country pusses as you 
enjoy, to be compared with a life like this . ? The Ant, 
who by this time had composed herself, replied with 
a great deal of temper, and no less severity: Indeed, 
to be a guest at an entertainment of the Gods, is a 
very great honour, if one is invited ; but I should not 
care to be a disagreeable intruder any where. You 
talk of the king and tne court, and the line ladies 
there, with great familiarity ; but as I have been get- 
ting in my harvest in summer, I have seen a certain 
person, under the town-walls, making a hearty meal 
upon something that is not so proper to be mentioned. 
As to your frequenting the altars, you are in the right to 
take sanctuary where you are like to meet with the least 
disturbance : but I have known people before now run 
to altars, and call it devotion, when they have been 
shut out of all good company, and had no where else 
to go. You don't work for your living, you say; true: 
therefore when you have played away the summer, 
and winter comes, you have nothing to live upon : and, 
while you are starving with cold and hunger, I have 
a good warm house over my head, and plenty of pro- 
visions about me. 



D 



56 JESOFS FABLES. 



THE APPLICATION. 

This fable points out to us the different characters of 
those that recommend themselves in vain-glorious ways 
by false and borrowed lights; and of those whose real 
merit procures them a good esteem wherever they go. 
Poverty and folly having, at the same time, possession 
of any one man, cannot fail of making him an object of 
pity, if not of contempt; but, when an empty conceited 
pride happens to be joined with them, they render the 
creature in whom they meet, at the same time despicable 
and ridiculous. One who often attends at court, not be- 
cause he has a place, but because he has not, should not 
value himself upon his condition. They who go to 
church out of vanity and curiosity, and not for pure de- 
rotion, should not value themselves upon their religion, 
for it is not worth a straw. They who eat at a three- 
penny ordinary, and sometimes not so well, should not 
boast either of their dinner or company. In short, no 
body is a better gentleman than he whose own honest 
industry supplies him with plenty of all necessaries ; 
who is so well acquainted with honour, as never to say 
or do a mean and unjust thing; and \*ho despises an 
idle scoundrel, but knows how to esteem men of his own 
principles. Such a one is a person of the first quality, 
though he has never a title, and ought to take place of 
every man who is not so good as himself. 



AISOP'S FABLES. 
FAB. XXVIII. The OLD HOUND. 







\ N old Hound, who had been an excellent good 
* one in his time, and given his master great sport 
and satisfaction in many a chase, at last, by ihe effect 
of years, became feeble and unserviceable. Hov, ever, 
being in the field one day, when the Stag was almost 
run down, he happened to be the first that came in 
with him, and seized him by one of his haunches; but; 
his decayed and broken teeth not being able to keep 
their hold, the Deer escaped, and threw him quite out. 
Upon which, his master, being in a great passion, and 
going to strike him, the honest old creature is said to 
have barked out this apology: Ah! do not strike your 
poor old servant; it is not my heart and inclination, 
but my strength and speed that fail me. If what I now 
am displeases, pray don't forget what I have been. 

D c 



53 &SOPS FABLES. 

THE APPLICATION. 

This fable may serve to give to us a general view of the 
ingratitude of the greatest part of mankind. Notwith- 
standing all the civility and complaisance that is used 
among people, where there -is a common intercourse of 
business, yet, let the main spring, the probability of their 
being serviceable toeachother,either in point ofpleasure 
or profit, be but once broken, and farewell courtesy : so 
far from continuing any regard in behalf of past favours, 
it is very well if they forbear doing any thingthat is inju- 
rious. If the master had only ceased to caress and make 
much of the old Hound when he was past doing any ser- 
vice, it had not been very strange ; but to treat a poor 
creature ill, not for a failure of inclination, but merely a 
defect of nature, must, notwithstanding the crowd of 
examples there are to countenance it, be pronounced in- 
human and unreasonable. 

There are two accounts upon which people that have 
been useful are frequently neglected. One when they 
are so decayed, either through age or some accident,that 
they are no longer able to do the services they have for- 
merly done; the other, when the occasion or emergency, 
which required such talents, no longer exists. Phaedrus, 
who more than once complains of the bad consequences 
of age, makes no other application to this fable, than by 
telling his friend Philetus, with some regret, that he 
wrote it with a view ; having, it seems, been repaid with 
neglect, or worse usage, for services done in his youth, 
to those who were then able to afford him a better recom- 
pence. 



AESOP'S FABLES. 
FAB. XXIX. The SICK KITE. 




A KITE had been sick a long time ; and finding 
** there were no hopes of recovery, hedged of his 
mother to go to all the rfiurches and religious houses 
in the country, to try what pra\ers and promises would 
effect in his behalf. The old Ki>e replied, Indeed 
dear son, I would willingly undertake any thing to save 
your life, but I have great reason to despair of doing 
you any service in the way you propose : for, with 
what face can I ask any thing of the Gods in favour of 
one, whose whole life has been a continual scene of 
rapine and injustice, and who has not scrupled, upoa 
occasion, to rob the very altars themselves ? 

THE APPLICATION. 

The rehearsal of this fable almost unavoidably draws 
our attention to that very serious and important point, 
the consideration of a death-bed repentance. And, 



54 JESOP'S FABLES. 

to expose the absurdity of relying upon such a weak 
foundation, we need only ask the same question with the 
Kite in the fable : how can he that has offended the Gods 
all his life-time, by doing actsof dishonour and injustice, 
expect that they should be pleased with him at last, for 
no other reason bat because he fears he shall not be 
able to oft'end them any longer ; (when, in truth, such 
a repentance can signify nothing but a confirmation of 
his former impudence and folly : for sure no stupidity 
can exceed that of the man who expects future judg- 
ment, and yet can bear to commit any piece of injustice, 
with a sense and deliberation of the fact." 



FAB. XXX. The HARES and the FROGS. 




TTPON a great st6rm of wind that blew among the 
** trees and buslies, and made a rustling among the 
leaves, the Hares (in a certain park where there hap- 
pened to be plenty of them) were so terribly frighted 
that they run like mad all over the place, resolving to 
seek out some retreat of more security, or to end their 



AESOP'S FABLES. 55 

unhappy days by doing violence to themselves. With 
this resolution they found an outlet where a pale had 
been broken down ; and, bolting forth upon an adjoin- 
ing common, had not run far before their course was 
stopt by that of a gentle brook, which glided across the 
way they intended to take. This was so grievous a 
flisappointment that they were not abic to bear it; and 
they determined rather to throw themselves headlong 
into the water, let what would become of it, than lead 
a life so full of dangers and crosses. But upon their 
coming to the brink of the river, a parcel of Fro^,s, 
which were sitting there, frighted at their approach, 
leapt into the stream in great confusion, and dived to 
the very bottom for fear. Which a cunning old puss 
observing, called to the rest and said, Hold; have a 
care what ye do : here are other creatures, I perceive, 
which have their fears as well as us ; don't then let us 
fancy ourselves the most miserable of any upon earth; 
but rather, by their example, learn to bear patiently 
those inconveniences which our nature has thrown up- 



THE APPLICATION, 

This fable is designed to show us how unreasonable 
many people are, fur living in such continual fears and 
disquiets about the miserableness of their condition. 
There is hardly any state of life great enough to satis- 
fy the wishes of an ambitious man ; and scarce any so 
mean, but may supply all the -necessities of him that 
is moderate. But if people will be so unwise as to work 
themselves up to imaginary misfortunes, why do they 
grumble at nature and their stars, when their own per- 
verse minds are only to blame ? If we are to. conclude 
ourselves unhappy by as many degrees as thereare others 
greater then we, why then the greatest part of mankind 
mast be miserable, in some degree at least. But, if 



M> ^fcSOP'S FABLES. 

they who repine at their own afflicted condition, \vould 
but reckon up how many more there are with whom they 
would not change cases, than those whose pleasures they 
envy, they would certainly rise up better satisfied from 
.uch a calculation. Eut what shall we say to those who 
have a way. of creating themselves panics from the rust- 
ling of the wind, the scratching of a Rat or Mouse be- 
hind the hangings, the fluttering of a Moth, or the mo- 
tion of their own shadow by moonlight : Their whole 
life is as full of alarms as that of a Hare, and they never 
think themselves so happy as when, like the timorous 
folks in i he (able, they meet with a set of creatures as 
learlVi! li-s themselves. 



FAB. XXXI. The LION and the MOUSE. 




A Li ON, faint with heat, and weary with hunting 
was laid down to take his repose under the spread- 
ing boughs of a thick shady oak. -It happened that, 
while he slept, a company of scrambling Mice ran 
over his back, and waked him. Upon which, starting 
up, he clapped his paw upon one of them, and was just 



JESOP'S FABLES. 57 

going to put it to death, when the little suppliant im- 
plored his mercy in a very moving manner, begging 
him not to stain his noble character with the blood of 
so despicable and small a beast. The Lion, consider- 
ing the matter, thought proper to do as he wa;; d< sired, 
and immediately released his little trembling prisoner. 
Not long after, traversing the forest in pursuit of his 
prey, he chanced to run into the toils of the hunters; 
from whence, uot able to disengage himself, he set up 
a most hideous aud loud roar, The Mouse, hearing 
the voice, and knowing it to be the Lion's, immediately 
repaired to the place, and bid him fear nothing, for 
that he was his friend. Then straight he fell to work, 
and, with his little sharp teeth, gnawing asunder the 
knots and fastenings of the toils, set the royal brute at 
liberty. 



THE APPLICATION. 

This fable gives us to understand, that there is r\o per- 
son in the world so little, but even the greatest may, at 
some time or other, stand in need of his assistance ; and 
consequently that it is good to use clemency, u here there 
is any room for it, towards thofe who fall within our 
power. A generosity of this kind is a handsome virtue, 
and looks very graceful whenever it is&xei';ed, if there 
were nothing else in it: but, as the lowest people in life 
mav, upon occasion, have it in their power either to 
serre or hurt u>, that makes it our duty, in point of com- 
mon interest, to behave ourselves vvith good- nature and 
lenity towards all w ith whom we nave to do. Then the 
gratitude of the Mouse, and his readiness, not only to re- 
pay, but even to exceed, the obligation due to his bene- 
factor, notwithstanding his little body, give usthe spe- 
cimen of a great soul, which is never so much delighted 
as with an opportunity of showing bow sensible it is cf 
favour received. 



D 5 



FABLES. 
FAB. XXXIL The FATAL MARRIAGE. 




HP HE Liovn aforesaid, touched with the grateful 
procedure of the Mouse, and, resolving not to 
be outdone in generosity by any wild beast whatso- 
ever, desired his little deliverer to name his own 
terms, for that he might depend upon his complying 
with any proposal he should make. The Mouse, 
fired with ambition at this gracious offer, did not so 
much consider what was proper for him to ask, as 
what was in the power of his prince to grant; and o, 
presumptuously demanded his princely daughter, the 
young Lioness, in marriage. The Lion consented: 
Init, when he would have given the royal virgin into 
his possession, she, like a giddy thing as she was, not 
minding how she walked, by chance set her paw upon 
her spouse, who was coming to meet her. and crushed 
her little dear to pieces. 



AESOP'S FABLES. 59 



THE APPLICATION. 

This fable seems intended to show us, how miserable 
some people make ihemselves by a wrong choice, when 
they have all the good things in the world spread before 
them to choose out of. In short, if that one particular of 
judgment be wanting, it is not in the power of the great- 
est monarch upon earth, nor of the repeated smiles of 
fortune to make us happy. It is the want of possession 
of a good judgment, which oftentimes makes the prince 
a poor wretch, and the poor philosopher completely easy. 
Now, the first and chief degree of judgment is to know 
one'* self; to be able to make a tolerable estimate of one's 
own capacity, so as not to speak or undertake any thing 
which may either injure or make us ridiculous: and yet 
(as wonderful as it is) there have been men of allowed 
good-sense in particular, and possessed of all desirable 
qualifications in general, to make life delightful and 
agreeable, whohave unhappily contrived to match them- 
selves with women of a genius and temper necessarily 
tending to blast their peace. This proceeds from some 
unaccountable blindness: but when wealthy plebeians 
of mean extraction, and unrefined education, as an equi- 
ralent for their money, demand brides out of the nurse- 
ries of our peerage, their being despised, or at least over- 
looked, is so unavoidable, unless in extraordinary cases, 
that nothing but a false taste of glory could make them 
at*r upon a scheme so inconsistent" and unpromising. 



60 , AESOP'S FABLES. 

FAB. XXXIII. The WOOD and the CLOWN. 




\ COUNTRY fellow came -one day into the wood, 
C*- and looked about him with some concern; upon 
uhich the Trees, with a curiosity natural to some 
other creatures, asked him what he wanted. He re- 
plied, that he only wanted a piece of wood to make 
a handle to his hatchet. Since that was all, it was 
voted unanimously that he should have a piece of 
good, sound, tough ash. But he had no sooner re- 
ceived and fitted it for his purpose, than he begun to 
lay about him unmercifully, and to hack and hew with- 
out distinction, felling the noblest trees in all the fo- 
rest. The Oak is said to have spoken thus to the 
Beech, in a low whisper, Brother, we must take it 
for our pains. 

THE APPLICATION. 

No people are more justly liable to suffer, than they 
who furnish their enemies with any kind of assistance- 



/ESOP'S FABLES. lu 

It is generous to forgive; it is ei joined us by religion 
to l-ive our enemies; but lie tluv trusts an enemy, 
much more commutes to the strengthening au-i arming 
of him, may alni't. depend upon repenting him f,-r his 
inadvertent benevolence : and ha, moreover, this to 
add to his distress, that when he might have prevented 
it, he brought his misfortunes upon himself by his own 
credulity. 

Any person in a community, by what name or title 
soever dis:inguished, who ailbcts a power which may 
possibly hurt the people, is an enemy to that people, 
and therefore they ought not to trust him : for though 
he were ever so fu>ly determined not 10 abuse such a 
power, yet he is so far a bad man, as he disturbs the 
people's quiet, and makes them jralous and uneasy, by 
desiring to have it, or even retaining it, when it may 
prove iuisclm vous. If we conduit history, we shall find 
that the thing called prerogative has been claimed and 
contended for chiefly by those who never intended to 
make a good use of it ; and as readily resigned and 
tkroxvn up by just and wise princes, who had th-- true- 
interest of their people at heait. How like s< r.-eless 
stocks do they act, who, by complimenting some capri- 
cious mortal from time to time, with parcels of preroga- 
tive, at last put it out of their power to defend and main- 
tain thernselfes in their just and natural liberty ! 



62 JESOFS FABLES. 

FAB. XXXIV. The HORSE and the STAG. 




npHE Stag, \viih bis sharp horns, got the better 
* of the Horse, and drove him clear out of the 
pasture where they used to feed together. So the 
latter craved the assistance of man ; and, in order to 
receive the benefit of it, suffered him to put a bridle 
into his mouth and a saddle upon his back. By 
this way of proceeding, he entirely defeated his 
enemy ; but was mightily disappointed, when, upon. 
returning thanks and desiring to be dismissed, he 
received this answer: No; I never knew before how 
useful a drudge you were ; now I have found what 
you are good for, you may depend upon it 1 will keep; 
you to it* 

THE APPLICATION. 

As the foregoing fable was intended to caution us 
against consenting to any thing that might prejudice 
public liberty ; this may serve to ke^p us upon our 



AESOP'S FABLES. 63 

guard in the preservation of that which ii of a private 
nature. This is the use and interpretation given of it 
by Horace, the best and most polite philosopher that 
ever wrote. After reciting the fable, he applies it thus: 
This, says he, is the case with him, \vho, dreading poverty, 
parts with that invaluable jewel, liberty ; like a wretch 
as he is, he will always be subject to a tyrant of some 
sort or other, and be a slave for ever ; because his ava- 
ricious spirit knew not how to be contented with that 
moderate competency, which he might have possessed, 
independent of all the world. 

FAB. XXXV. 
The COUNTRY MOUSE and the CITY MOUSE* 




A N honest, plain, sensible country Mouse, is said 
**- to have entertained at his hole one day a fine 
Mouse of the town. Having formerly been playfel- 
lows together ; they were old acquaintances, which 
served as an apology for the visit. However, as 
master of the house, he thought himself obliged to 



&i AESOP'S FABLES. 

do the honours of it, in all respects, and to make 
as great a stranger of his guest as he possibly could. 
In order to this, he set before him a i- .serve of de- 
licate grey-pease and bacon, a dish of fine oatmeal, 
some parings of new cheese; aud, to crown all with 
a dessert, a remnant of a charming mellow apple. 
In good manners, he forbore to eat any himself, lest 
the stranger should not have enough; but, that he 
might seem to bear the other company, sat and nib- 
bled a piece of \\heaten straw, very busily. At last, 
says the spark of the town, Oid croney, give me leave 
to be a little free with you; how 7 can you bear to live 
in this nasty, dirty, melancholy hole here, with nothing 
but woods, and meadows, and mountains, and rivu- 
lets about you? Do not you prefer the conversation 
of the world to the chirping of birds, and the splendor 
of a court to the rude aspect of an Uncultivated desert ? 
Come, take my word for it, you will find it a change 
for the better. Never stand considering, but away 
this moment. Remember we are not immortal, and 
therefore have no time to lose. Make sure of to-day, 
and spend it as agreeably as you can, you know not 
what 11 ray happen to-morrow. In short, these, and 
such like arguments pre\ ailed, and his country ac- 
quaintance \vas resolved to go to town that night. So 
they both set out upon their journey together, pro- 
posing to sneak in after the close of the evening. 
They did so : and, about midnight, made their entry 
into a certain great house, where there had been an 
extraordinary entertainment the day before, and several 
tit-bits, which some, of the servants had purloined, 
were hid under the seat of a window : the country- 
guest was immediately placed in the midst of a rich 
Persian carpet ; and now it was the courtier's turn to 
entertain, who indeed acquitted himself in that capa- 
city with the utmost readiness and address, changing 



S FABLES. 6'5 

the courses as elegantly, and tasting every thing first 
as judiciously as any clerk of a kitchen. The ether 
sat and enjoyed himself like a delighted epicure, 
tickled to the last degree with this new turn of his af- 
fairs; when, on a sudden, a noise of somebody open- 
ing the door, made them start from their seats, and 
scuttle in confusion about the dining-room. Our 
country-friend, in particular, was ready to die with 
fear at the barking of a huge Mastiff or two, which 
opened their throats just about the same lime, and 
made the whole house echo. At last, recovering 
himself, Well, says he, if this be your town-life, much 
good may do you with it : give me my poor quiet hole 
again, with my homely, but comfortable grey pease. 



,THE APPLICATION. 

A moderate fortune with a quiet retirement in the 
country, is preferable to the grea'e^t affluence which 
is attended with care and the perplexity of business, 
and inseparable from the noise and hurry of ihe towji. 
The practice of the generality of pe. 'Me of the best 
taste, it is to be owned, is directly against us in this 
point; but, when it is considered that this practice of 
theirs proceeds rather from a compliance with, the fa- 
shion of the times, than their own private thoughts, 
the objection is of no force. Among the great n.;in- 
bers of men who have received a learned education, 
how few are there but either have their fortunes en- 
tirely to make; or at least, think they deserve to have, 
and oUjjht not to lose the opportunity of getting some- 
what more than their fathers have Jefi them ! The 
town is the field of action for volunteers of this 
kind ; and whatever fondness they may have for the 
country, yet they must stay till their circumstances will 
admit of a retreat thither. But sure there never was a 
man yet, who lived in a constant return of trouble and 
fatigue in town, as all men of business do in some degree 



66 ^SOP'S FABLES. 

or other, but has formed to himself some end of getting 
a sufficient competency, which may enable Him to pur- 
chase a quiet possession in the country, where he may 
indulge his genius, and give up his old age to that easy 
smooth life, which in the tempest of business, he had so 
often longed for. Can any thing argue more strongly 
for a country life, than to observe what a long course of 
labour people go through, and what difficulties they en- 
counter to come at it ? They look upon it, at a distance, 
like a kind of heaven, a place of rest and happiness ; and 
are pushing forward, through the rugged thorny cares of 
the world, to make their way towards it. Jf there are 
many, who, though born to plentiful fortunes, yet live 
most partof their time in the noise, the smoke, and hurry 
of the town ; we shall find, upon enquiry, that necessary 
indispensable business is the real or pretended plea 
which n>est of them have to make for it. The court and 
the senate require the attendance of some : law-suits, 
and the proper direction of trade engage others: they 
who have a sprightly wit, and an elegant taste for con- 
versation, will resort to the place which is frequented by 
people of the same turn, whatever aversion they may 
otherwise have for it; and others, who have no such pre- 
tence, have yet this to say, that they follow the fashion. 
They who appear to have been men of the best sens 
amongst the ancients, always recommended the country 
as the most proper scene for innocence, ease, and virtuous 
pleasure ; and, accordingly, lost no opportunities of en- 
joying it : and men of the greatest distinction among 
the moderns have ever thought themselves most happy, 
when they could be decently spared from the employ- 
ments which the excellency of their talents necessarily 
threw them into, to embrace the charming leisure of & 
country life. 



AZOF'S FABLES. 67 

FAB. XXXVI. The MOUSE and ///<?WEASLE. 




A LITTLE, starveling, thin-gutted rogue of a Mouse, 
had, with much pushing and application, made 
his way through a small hole in a corn-basket, where 
he stuffed and crammed so plentifully, that when he 
would have retired the way he came, he found himself 
too plump, with all his endeavours, to accomplish it. 
A Weasel who stood at some distance, and had been 
diverting himself with beholding the vain efforts of the 
little fat thing, called to him, and said: Harkee! 
honest friend, if you have a mind to make your escape, 
there is but one way for it; contrive to grow as poor 
and as lean as you were when you entered, and then 
perhaps you may get off. 

THE APPLICATION. 

They who, from a poor mean condition, insinuate 
themselves into a good estate, are not always the most 
happy. There is, many times, a quiet and content 



<53- JESOP'S FABLES. 

attending a low life, to which the rich man is an utter 
stranger. Riches ?nd cares are almost inseparable ; and 
whoever \voukl get rid of the one, must content himself 
to be divested of the other. He that hath been ac- 
quainted with the sweets of a life free from the incurn- 
brance of wealth, and longs to enjoy them again, must 
strip himself of that incumbrance, if he ever means to 
aitafn his wishes. 

Some, from creeping into the lowest stations of life, 
have, in process of time, filled the greatest places in it ; 
and grown so bulky by pursuing their insatiate appetite 
after money, that when they would have retired, they 
found themselves too opulent and full to get oft'. There 
has been no expedient for them to creep out, till they 
were squeezed and reduced in some measure to their 
primitive littleness. They that fill themselves.with that 
which is the property of others, should always be so 
served before they are suffered to escape. 

FAB XXXVII. The BELLY and the MEMBERS. 




TN former duys, vdit.ii the Be;i\ and the oilur parts 
*- of the body enjoyed the faculty of speech, and had 
separate views and designs of their own ; each part, 



S FABLES. 69 

it seems, in particular, for himself, and in the name of 
the whole, took exception at the conduct of the Belly, 
and were resolved to grant him supplies no longer. They 
said they thought it very hard, that he should lead an. 
idle good-for-nothing life, spending and squandering 
away, upon his o\vn ungodly guts, ail the fruits of their 
labour; and that, in short, they were resolved for the 
future to strike off his allowance, and let him shift 
for himself as well as he could. The hands protested 
they would not lift up a linger to keep him from star- 
ving ; and the mouth wished he might never speak 
again, if he took in the least bit of nourishment for 
him so long as he lived ; and, say the teeth, may we 
be rotten if ever we chew a morsel for him for the 
future. This solemn league and covenant was kept 
as long as any thing of that kind can be kept, which 
w as, until each of the rebel members pined away to 
the skin and bone, and could hold ont no longer. 
Then they found there was no doing without the Belly, 
and that, as idle and insignificant as he seemed, he 
contributed as much to the maintenance and welfare 
of all the other parts, as they did to his. 



THE APPLICATION 

This fable was spoken by Menenius Agrippa, a fa- 
mous Roman consul and genera), when he was deputed 
by the senate to appease a dangerous tumult and insur- 
rection of the people. The ma.iy wars that nation was 
engaged in, and the frequent supplies they were obliged 
to raise, had so soured and inflamed the minds of the 
populace, that they were resolved to endure it no longer, 
and obstinately refused to pay the taxes which were le- 
vied upon them. It is easy to discern how the great 
man applied his fable. For, if the branches and mem- 
bers of a community refuse the government that aid 
which its necessities require, the whole must perish to- 
gethef. The rulers of a state, as idle and insignificant 



70 



.KSOP'S FABLES. 



as they may sometimes seem, are yet as necessary to be 
kept up and maintained in a proper and decent gran* 
deur, as the family of eat h private person is, in a con- 
dition suitable to itself. Every man's enjoyment of that 
little which he gains by his daily labour, depends upon 
the government's being maintained in a condition t(* 
defend and secure him in it. 



FAB. XXXV1IL 

The LARK n d her Yo UNO ONES. 




A LARK, \vho-had young ones in a field of corn 
-**- which was almost ripe, was under some fear lest 
the reapers should come to reap it before her young 
brood was fledged, aii'lableto remove from the place. 
Wherefore, upon flying abroad to look for food, she 
left this charge with -them: That they should take no- 
tice what they heard talked of iu her absence, and tell 
her of it when she came back, again. When she was 
.gone, they heard the owner of the corn call to his son : 
Well, says he, I think this corn is ripe enough; I 
have you go early to-morrow, and desire our 



AESOP'S FABLES. 71 

friends and neighbours to come and help us to reap it. 
When the old Lark came home, the young ones fell a 
quivering and chirping round her, and told her \vhat 
had happened, begging her to remove them as fast as 
she could. The mother bid them be easy; for, says 
she, if the owner depends upon his friends and neigh- 
bours, I am pretty sure the corn will not be reaped 
to-morrow. Next day, she went out again, upon the 
same occasion, and left the same orders with them as 
before. The owner came, and staid, expecting those 
he had sent to: bur the sun grow hot, and nothing was 
done, for not a soul came to help him. Then,sayshe, 
to his son, I perceive these friends of ours are not to 
be depended upon, so that you must even go to your 
uncles and cousins, and tell them I desire they would 
be here betimes to-morrow morning to help us to 
reap. Well, this the young ones, in a great fright, re- 
ported also to their mother. If that be all, says she, 
do not be frightened, children, for kindred and rela- 
tions do not use to be so very forward to serve one 
another : but take particular notice what you hear said 
the next time, and be sure you let me know it. She 
went abroad the next day, as usual; and the owner, 
finding his relations as slack as the rest of his neigh- 
bours, said to his son, Ilarkee, George, do you get a 
couple of good sickles ready against to-morrow morn- 
ing, and we will even reap the corn ourselves. When 
the young ones told their mother this, Then says she, 
we must be gone indeed ; for when a man undertakes 
to do his business himself, it is not so likely that lie 
will be disappointed. So she removed her young ones 
immediately, and the corn was reaped the next day by 
the good man aad his son. 



FABLES. 



THE APPLICATION. 

Never depend upon the assistance of friends and re- 
lations in anything which you are able to do yourself; 
for nothing is more fickle and uncertain. The man who 
relies upon another for the execution of any affair of im- 
portance, is not only kept in a wretched and slavish sus- 
pense, while he expects the issue of the matter, but ge- 
nerally meets with a disappointment. While he who 
lays the chief stress of his business upon himself, and 
depends upon his own industry and attention for the 
iuccess of his affairs, is in the fairest way to attain his 
end : and, if at last he should miscarry, has this to com- 
fort him, that it was not through his own negligence 
and a vain expectation of the assistance of friends. To 
stand by ourselves, as much as possible to exert our 
own strength and vigilance in the prosecution of our 
affairs is godlike, being the result of a most noble and 
highly exalted reason ; but they who procrastinate and 
defer the business of life by an idle dependence upon 
others, in things which it is in their own power to effect, 
sink down into a kind of stupid and abject slavery, and 
show themselves unworthy of talents with which human 
nature is dignified. 



.ESOP S FABLES. 73 

FAB. XXXI. The NURSE and the WOLF. 




A NURSE, who was endeavouring to quiet a fro ward 
J -*- bawling child, among other attempts, threatened 
to throw it out of doors to the Wolf, if it did not leave 
off crying. A Wolf, who chanced to be prowling near 
the door just at that time, heard the expression, and 
believing the woman to be in earnest, waited a lung 
while about the house in expectation of seeing her 
words made good. But at last the child, wearied with 
its own importunities, fell asleep, and the poor Wolf 
was forced to return back to the woods empty and sup- 
periess. The Fox meeting him, and surprised to see 
bim going home so thin and disconsolate, asked him 
what the matter was, and how he came to speed no 
better that night ? Ah ! do not ask me, says he, I was 
so silly as to believe what the nurse said, and have beefl 
disappointed. 



E 



74 



AESOP'S FABLES. 



THE APPLICATION. 

AU the moralists have agreed to interpret this fable 
as a caution to us never to trust a woman. What rea- 
sons rhey could have for giving so rough and unc<>unly 
a precept, is nut easy to be imagined : for howevei fickle 
and unstable some women may be, it is ell known there 
are several who have a greater regard for tru'h in what 
they assert or promise, than most men. There is not 
room in so short a compass to express a due concern for 
the honour of the ladies upon this occasion, nor u> show 
how much one is disposed to vindicate them : and 
though there is nothing bad which can he said of them, 
but may, with equal justice, be averred of the other sex ; 
yet one would not venture to give ihem quite ?>o absolute 
a precaution as the old mythologists have affixed to this 
fable, but only to advise them to consider well and tho- 
roughly of the matter, before they trust any man living. 

FAB. XL. The TORTOISE and the EAGLE. 




THE Tortoise, weary of his condition, by which he 
was confined to creep upon the ground, and being 
ambitious to have a prospect, and look about him, 



FABLES. 75 

gave out, that if any Bird woirid take him up into the 
air, and show him the world, he would reward him with 
a discovery of many precious stones, which he knew 
were hidden in a certain place of the earth : the Eagle 
undertook to do as he desired ; and when he had per- 
formed his commission, demanded the reward. But 
finding the Tortoise could not make good his words, 
he stuck his talons into the softer parts of hii body, and 
made him a sacrifice to his revenge. 

THE APPLICATION. 

As men of honour ought to consider calmly how far 
the things which they promise may be in their power, 
before they venture to make promises upon this account, 
because the non-performance of them will be apt to ex- 
cite an uneasiness within themselves, and tarnish their 
reputation in the eyes of other people ; so fools and cow- 
ards should be as little rash in this respect as possible, 
lest their impudent forgeries draw upon them the resent- 
ment of those whom they disappoint, and that resent- 
ment makes them undergo smart, but deserved chastise- 
ment. The man who is so stupid a knave as to make a 
lying promise where he is sure to be detected, receives 
the punishment of his folly unpitied by all that knovr 
him. 



7-6 



AESOP'S FABLES. 



FAB. XLL T'ie WIND and the SUN. 




A DISPUTE once arose betwixt the North-wind and 
*"*- the Sun, about the superiority of their power; 
and they agreed to try their strength upon a traveller, 
'which should be able to get his cloak off first. The 
North-wind began, and blew a very cold blast, accom- 
panied with a sharp. driving shower. But this, and 
whatever else he could do, instead of making the man 
quit his cloak, obliged him to gird it about his body 
as close as possible. Next came the Sun ; who break- 
ing out from a thick watery cloud, drove away the 
cold vapors from the sky, and darted his warm sultry 
beams upon the head of the poor weather-beaten tra- 
veller. The man growing faint with the heat, and un- 
able to endure it any longer, first throws off his heavy 
cloak, and then flies for protection to the shade of a 



AESOP'S FABLES. 77 



THE APPLICATION. 

There is something in the temper of man so averse 
to severe and boisterous treatment, that h who endea- 
vours to carry his point that way, instead of prevailing 1 , 
generally leaves the mind of him, whom he has thus 
attempted, in a more confirmed and obstinate situation, 
than he found it at first. , Bitter words and hard usage 
freeze the heart into a kind of obduracy, which mild 
persuasion and gentle language only can dissolve and 
soften. Persecution has always fixed and rivetted those 
opinions which it was intended to dispel ; and some dis- 
cerning men have attributed the quick growth of Chris- 
tianity, in a great measure, to the rough and barbarous 
reception which its first teachers met within the world. 
The same may have been observed of our reformation : 
the blood of the martyrs was the manure which pro- 
duced the great protestant crop, on which the church 
of England has subsisted ever since. Providence, which 
always makes use of the most natural means to attain 
its purpose, has thought fit to establish the purest religion 
by this method : the consideration of which may give a 
proper check to those who are continually endeavouring 
to root out errors by that very management, which so 
infallibly fixes and implants all opinions, as well erro- 
neous as orthodox. When an opinion is so violently 
attacked, it raises an attention in the persecuted party* 
and gives an alarm to their vanity, by making them 
think that worth defending and keeping, at the hazard 
of their lives, which perhaps, otherwise, they would 
only have admired a while for the sake of its novelty, 
and afterwards resigned of their own accord. In short, 
a fierce turbulent opposition, like the north-v^nd, only 
serves to make a man wrap up his notions more closely 
abaut him; but we know not what a kind, warm, sun- 
shiny behaviour, rightly applied, would not be able to* 
effect. 



78 



AESOP'S FABLES. 



FAB. XL1I. The Ass in the LION'S SKIN. 




A N Ass, finding the skin of a Lion, put it on ; and 
*"* going into the woods and pastures, threw all the 
flocks and herds into a terrible consternation. At last, 
meeting his owner, he would have frightened him also; 
but the good man, seeing his long ears stood out, pre- 
sently knew him, and with a good cudgel made him 
sensible, that, notwithstanding his being drest m a 
Lion's skin, he was really no more than an Ass. 



THE APPLICATION. 

As all affectation is wrong, and tends to expose and 
make a man ridiculous, so the more distant he is from 
the thing which he affects to appear, the stronger will 
the ridicule be which he excites, and the greater the in- 
conveniences into which he runs himself thereby. How 
strangely absurd it is for a timorous person to procure a 
military post, in order to keep himself out of danger! 
and to fancy a red coat the surest protection of cow- 



FABLES. 73 

ardice ! yet there have been those who have purchased 
a commission to avoid being insulted ; and have been 
so si .ly as to think courage was interwoven with a sash, 
or i" J up in a cuckade. But it would not be amiss for 
S'icii grmlemen to consider, that it is not in the power 
of scarlet, cloth to alter nature ; and that, as it is ex- 
pected a soldier should show himself a man of courage 
and intrepidity upon all proper occasions, they may by 
this means meet the disgrace .they intended to avoid, 
anil appear greater asses than they need to have done. 
However, it is not in point of fortitude only, that people 
are liable to expose themselves, by assuming a character 
to which they are not equal; but he who puts on a show 
of learning, of religion, of a superior capacity in any re- 
spect j or, in short, of any \ irtue or knowledge to which 
he has no proper claim, is, and will always be found to 
be, an Ass in a Lion's Skin. 

Wolf having laid in store of provision, kept 
close at home, and made much of himself. 
The Fox observed this, and thinking it something 
particular, went to visit him, the better to inform him- 
self of the truth of the matter. The Wolf ex- 
cused himself from seeing him, by pretending he 
was very much indisposed. All this did but confirm 
the Fox in his suspicions: so away he goes to a 
Shepherd, and made discovery of the Wolf, telling 



AESOP'S FABLES. 283 

him he had nothing else to do but to come with a 
good weapon, and knock him on the head as he lay in 
his cave. The Shepherd followed his directions, and 
killed the Wolf. The wicked Fox enjoye^ the cave 
and provisions to himself, but enjoyed them not long, 
lor the same Shepherd passing afterwards by the same 
hole, and seeing the Fox there, dispatched him also. 

THE APPLICATION. 

This fable seems to be directed against the odious 
trade of informing. Not that giving information against 
criminals and enemies of the public, is in itself odious, 
for it is commendable ; but the circumstances and man- 
ner of doing it, oftentimes make it a vile and detestable 
employment, He that accuses another, 'merely fur the 
sake of the promised reward, or in hopes of gttting his 
forfeited estate, or with any other such mercenary view, 
nay, even to save his own Jife, whatever he gets by the 
bargain, is sure to lose his reputation. For, indeed, the 
most innocent company is not safe with such a one in it, 
nor the neighbourhood secure in which he lives. A 
villain of his stamp, whose only end U getting, will as 
soon betray the innocent as the guilty : let him but 
know where there is a suspected person, and propose the 
reward, and he will scarce fail to work the suspicion up 
to high treason, or be at a loss to give sufficient proots 
of it. We have no small comfort concerning this sort 
of people, when we consider how improbable it is that 
they should thrive or prosper long in their ill-gotten 
possessions. For he that can betray another, for the 
sake of a little pelf, must be a man of such bad princi- 
ples, that it cannot be for the interest of any community 
to suffer him to live long in it. Besides, he himself will 
not be contented with one single villany ; and there 
is no fear but he will provoke justice to hurl down upon 
his head, at least, as great a calamity as he, by his ma- 
licious information, has brought upon another. 



284 A:SOFS FABLES. 

TAJ?. CLXVIII. The FROG and the MOUSE. 




HPHKRE was once a great emulation between the 
* Frog and the Mouse, which shou'cl be master of* 
the fen, and war ensued upon it. But the crafty 
Mouse, lurking under the grass in ambuscade, made 
sudden sallies, and often surprised the enemy at a dis- 
advantage. The Frog excelling in strength, and being 
more able to leap abroad, and take the field, challenged 
the Mouse to single combat. The Mouse- accepts 
the challenge ; and each of them entered the lists, 
armed with the point of a bulrush, instead of a spear. 
A Kite sailing in the air, beheid them afar off; and 
while they were eagerly bent upon each other, and 
pressing on to the duel, this fatal enemy descended 
souse upon them, and with her crooked talons, carried 
off both the champions. 

THE APPLICATION. 

Nothing so much -exposes a man's weak side, and 
lays him so open to an enemy, as passion and malice. 
He whose attention is wholly fixed upon forming a pro- 
ject of revenge, is ignorant of the mischiefs that inny 
be hatching against him from some other quarter, and 



AESOP'S FABLES. 28j 

upon the attack, ii unprovided with the means of de- 
fending or securing himself. How are the members of 
a commonwealth sometimes divided among themselves, 
and inspired with rancour and malice to the last degree; 
and often upon as great a trifle as that which was the 
subject matter of debate between the Frog and the 
Mouse ; not for any rea! advantage, bot merely who 
should get the better in the dispute: But such animosi- 
ties, as insignificant and trifling as they may be among 
themselves, are yet of the last importance to their ene- 
mies, by giving them many fair opportunities of falling 
upon them, and reducing them to misery and slavery. 
O Britons, when will ye be wise! when will ye throw 
away the ridiculous distinctions of party, those ends of 
bulrushes, and by a prudent unioa secure yourselres in 
a state of peace and prosperity ! A slate of which, if it 
were not for your intolerably foolish and unnecessary 
divisions at home, all the powers upon earth could never 
deprive you. 

The MAN and the WEASEL. 




LMAN had a caught a Weasel, and was just going 
to kill it. The poor creature, to escape death, 
cried out in a pitiful manner, O pray, do not kill me, 



286 JESOPS FABLES. 

for I am useful to you, and keep your house clear 
from Mice. Why, truly, says the man, if I thought 
you did it purely out of love to me, I should not only 
be inclined to pardon you, but think myself mightily 
obliged to you. But whereas you not only kill them, 
but yourself do the same mischief they would do, in 
eating and gnawing my victuals, I desire you would 
place your insignificant services to some other ac- 
count, and not to mine. Having said this, he took the 
wicked vermin and strangled it immediately. 

THE APPLICATION. 

This fable is pointed at those who are apt to impute 
actions, which are done with a private view of their own, 
to their zeal for the public. This is the case of many a 
poor Grub-street writer, who perhaps is for no party but 
himself, and of no principle but what is subservient to 
his own interest, yet has the impudence to cry himself up 
for a formal confessor of the cause that happens to flou- 
rish, a thorough honest man, who durst show himself 
in the worst of times. And with this politic view, there 
are a hundred thousand men in the nation, well at- 
tached to which party you please ; who are serving 
the interest of that side only, in their several capacities. 
By this way of working, they have a double advantage ; 
first, as they procure to themselves a good number of 
constant customers of the same faction : and, secondly, 
as they are entitled to some remote share in the go- 
vernment whenever their faction succeeds. But such 
a pretence to favour is, in truth, little better than that 
of the Weasel. Both may chance to have done the ser- 
vices they boast of; but as they were principally in- 
tended for the promotion of their own private affairs, 
whatever they might occasionally produce, cannot be a 
sufficient ground for them to raise any merit upon. A 
highwayman may as well plead in his own behalf/that 
he never robbed any but those who were enemies to 
the government, and men of unsound principles. But 
how absurd would such a pretence be ! 



jESOFS FABLES. 



287 



FAB. CLXX. 
and the IMPERTINENT FELLOW. 




SOP'S master came home, one day, somewhat 
* earlier than usual ; and, there happening to be no 
other slave in the house but /Esop, he was ordered to 
get supper ready as fast as he could. So away he runs 
to light a candle, in order to kindle his fire ; and the 
weather being warm, and it wanting a pretty deal of 
night, he went up and down to several houses, before 
he could speed^ At last, however, he found what he 
wanted ; and, being in haste, he made no scruple of re- 
turning directly over the market-place, which was his 
nearest way home. But as he went along, an imperti- 
nent fellow among the crowd caught him by the sleeve, 
and would fain have been arch upon him. O rare 
j^Lsop! says he, what occasion for a candle, old boy? 
w hat, are you going to light the sun to bed ? Let me 
alone, says /Esop, 1 am looking for a man. And having 
said this, away he scuttled home as fast as he could. 



28S 



AESOP'S FABLES. 



THE APPLICATION. 

It is not every one who calls himself a man, or bears 
the appearance of one, that truly deserves the name. If 
man be a reasonable creature, and none ought to be 
allowed for such, bul those who fully come up to that 
definition, it is certain one wo.uld have occasion for more 
light than that of the sun, to find them out by. And 
it is plain that our old philosopher did not take the im- 
pertinent fellow in thefable for one: nor, indeed, shouU 
such be looked upon as reasonable creatures, who, with 
empty nonsense, which they call wit, unseasonably in- 
terrupt men of thought aud business. When one is dis- 
posed to be merry, one may bear with any shallow, 
flashy buffoonery ; as music that is not the most elegant 
will keep up the spirits when once they are raised : but 
when the mind happens to be in a serious cast, and is 
wholly intent upon any matter of importance, nothing 
is so offensive as a fool or a fiddle. 

FAB.CLXXI. The HART and the VINE. 




A HART being pursued hard by the hunters, hid 
himself under the broad leaves of a shady spread- 
ing Vine. When the hunters were gone by, and had 



'S FABLES. 289 



given him over for lost, he, thinking himself very se- 
cure, began to crop and eat the leaves or the Vine. By 
this means the branches, being put into a rustling mo- 
tion, diew the eyes of the hunters that way; who, see- 
ing the Vine stir, and fancying some wild beast had 
taken covert there, shot their arrows at a venture, and 
killed the Hart, who, before he expired, uttered his 
dying words to this purpose; Ah! 1 suffer justly ibr 
my ingratitude, who could not forbear doin^ an injury 
to the Vine that so kindly concealed me in time of 



THE APPLICATION. 

Ingratitude has always been esteemed the biggest of 
crimes, and what, as it were, comprehends all other 
vices within it. Xor can we say, that this-estimation is 
rashly or unadvisedly madej for he that is capable of 
injuring his benefactor, what will he scruple towards 
another? If his conscience cannot be felt with the 
weight of an obligation added to it, much less will it 
have any influence where there is none. So that, upon, 
the whole, we may conclude, that the man who ha? 
been once guilty of ingratitude, will not stick at any 
other crime of an inferior nature. Since there are no 
human laws to punish this infamous prevailing mischief, 
it would be a great piece of human prudence to mark 
and observe this kind of criminals, in order to avoid all 
manner of communication with them. And if this 
were strictly put into execution, it couid be looked upon 
as no oilier than a just and proper punishment. 



290 AESOP'S FA15LES. 

FAB. CLXXII. The DRUNKEN HUSBAND. 




A CERTAIN Woman had a drunken husband, 
^"*- whom when she had endeavoured to reclaim se- 
veral ways, to no purpose, she tried this stratagem. 
"When he was brought home one night, dead drunk, as 
it seems he frequently used to be, she ordered him to 
be carried to a burin i-pl ace, and there laid in a vault, 
as if he had been dead indeed. Thus she left him, 
and went away, till she thought he might be come to 
himself, and grown sober again. When she returned 
and knocked at the door of the vault, the man cried 
out, Who's there ? I am the person, says she, in a 
dismal tone, that waits upon the dead folks, and I am 
come to bring you some victuals. Ah ! good waiter, 
says he, let the victuals alotre> and bring me a littl% 
drink, 1 beseech thee. The Woman hearing this, fell 
a tearing her hair, and beating her braast in a woeful 
manner. Unhappy wretch that I am, says she ; this 
was the only way that I could think of to reform the 
beastly sot ; but instead of gaining iny point, I am 



FABLES. '291 

only convinced that tfcis drunkenness is an incurable 
habit, which he intends to carry with him into the 
other world. 



THE APPLICATION. 

This fable is intended to show us the prevalence oi 
custom ; and how, by using ourselves much to any evil 
practice, we may let it grow into such a habit as we 
may be never able to divest ourselves of'. In any thing 
that \ve are sensible may be prejudicial to either our 
health or fortunes, we should take care not to let our 
inclinations run up into a habit : for though the former 
may be easily checked at our first setting out, and di- 
rected which way we please; yet the latter, like a head- 
strong, unruly horse in his full career, will have its own 
course, and we are hurried impetuously on, without the 
power of controling it. As the passions of young men 
are warm, and their imaginations lively, it would be 
wrong to endeavour to tie them up from the pursuit ot 
innocent pleasures. But those among them, that think 
at all, can never form a more useful and happy resolu- 
(ion, than not to suffer themselves to be drawn into a 
habit, even in indifferent and trifling things. He that 
keeps himself free from the slavery of habit, will always 
be at leisure to distinguish what is god for him, from 
that which is otherwise : and then there is no fear, but 
his cool, unbiassed judgmentwill direct him to such pur- 
suits as will be least hurtful, if not most, useful to him. 



292 JESOFS 1UBLES. 

FAB. CLXXUI. 77^ BLACKAMOOR. 




A CERTAIN man having bought a Blackamoor, was 
*% so simple as to think, thaf the colour of his skin 
\vas only dirt and filth, which he had contracted for 
want of due care, under his former master. This 
fault he fancied might easily be removed. So he or- 
dered the poor Black to be put into a tub, and was at 
a considerable charge in providing ashes, soap, and 
scrubbing-brushes for the operation. To work they 
\vent, rubbing and scouring his skin all over, but to 
no manner of purpose : for when they had repeated 
their washings several times, and were grown quite 
\veary, all they got by it was, that the wretched 
Blackamoor caught cold and died. 

THE APPLICATION. 

Many people attempt impossibilities for want of con- 
sidering the nature of things aright. Tor, as palpable 
f blunder as this man hi the fable committed, there are 
those who are guilty of as great. mistakes; especially 



'S FABIJ-S. 



93 

when they endeavour, by fruitless cultivations, to raise 
graces from the mind or body, of which neither is capa- 
ble. When any one went to meddle with arts and sci- 
ences, for which his genius was not well and prgperly 
adapted, the Greeks had a proverb to turn it into ridi- 
cule, by saying, He was no more tit for the business, 
than an Ass to play upon the harp. In short, when 
people learn to dance without shape and mien, to sing, 
or play on music without a voice or an ear, painting 
or poetry without a genius, it is attempting to wash the 
Blackamoor white. They can never attain their end, 
but at the same time expose themselves to the jocose 
humours of those that behold them. Instead of a grace, 
they acquire a deformity ; a* some boys at school, 
whom the master, by endeavouring to whip into a me* 
mory and bright parts, confirms stupid and invincible 
blockheads for ever. 



FAB. CLXXIV. The TRAVELLERS. 




PWO men travelling upon the road, one of them 
saw an axe lying upon the ground, where some- 
body hud been hewing timber : so taking it up, say* 



294 ^SOP'S FABLES. 

he, I have found au axe. Do not say I, says the other, 
but we have found ; for, as we are companions, we 
ought to share it betwixt us; but the first would not 
consent. However, they had not gone far, before the 
owner of the axe, hearing what was become of it, 
pursued them -with a warrant ; which, when the fel- 
low that had it, perceived, Alas! says he to his com- 
panion, we are undone. Nay, says the other, do not 
say we, but / am undone ; for, as you would not let 
me share the prize, neither will I share the danger 
with you. 

THE APPLICATION. 

This fable hints to us the eonveniency, if not the 
necessity, of making oui' friendships fum and lasting. 
And to this purpose, nothing is so requisite as a strict 
observance of the rules of honour and generosity ; for 
the very life and soul of friendship subsists upon-mutual 
benevolence, upon conferring and receiving obligations 
on either hand. A stingy, reserved behaviour starves it; 
it ought to be open, free, and communicative, without 
the least tincture of suspicion or distrust. For jealousy, 
in friendship, is a certain indication of a false heart, 
though in love it may be a distinguishing mark of a 
true one. Nor is there any thing merely chimerical or 
romantic in this notion; for, if we examine, \ve shall 
find, that reason will confirm the truth, and experience 
evince the utility of it. He that hopes for assistance, 
or accommodation in any exigency or time of misfor- 
tune, must lay in a provision for it, by \vatchjng the 
necessities of his acquaintance, and relieving the most 
deserving of them in their straits, by a ready and a 
willing contribution. By this means, gratitude, which 
is never wanting to an honest mind, will secure us a rea- 
sonable fund in reversion; and all the favours we be- 
stow will, like the tide of a river, in due season, flow 
back again upon us. 



.KSOP'S FABLES. 
FAB. CLXXV. The FISHERMAN. 



29,5 




CERTAIN Fisherman having laid his nets in the 
** river, and encompassed the whole stream from one 
side to the other, took a long pole, and fell a beating 
the water, to make the fish strike into his nets. One 
of the neighbours that lived thereabout, seeing him do 
so, wondered what he meant; and going up to him, 
Friend, says he, what are you doing here ? Do you 
think it is to be suffered, that you shall stand splashing 
and dashing the water, and make it so muddy that it 
is not fit for use ? Who do you think can live at this 
rate ! He was going on in a great fury, when the 
other interrupted him, and replied, i do not much 
trouble myself how you are to live with my doing this, 
bnt I assure you, that I cannot live without it. 

THE APPLICATION. 

This fable is levelled at those who, as the proverb says, 
love to fish in troubled icaters. There are some men of 
such execrable principles, that they do not care what 
mischief or what confusion they occasion in the world, 
provided they may but gratify some little selfish appe- 
tite. A thief will set a whole street on fire, to get an 
apportwnity of robbing one house ; an ill-natured per-- 



296 /ESOFS FABLES. 

son will kindle the flame of discord among friends and 
neighbours purely to satisfy his own malicious temper. 
And among the great ones, there are those, who, to suc- 
ceed in their ambitious designs will make no scruple 
of involving their country in di isions and animosities 
at home, and sometimes in war ml bloodshed abroad : 
provided they do but inaintan themselves in power, 
they care not what havoc and desolation they bring up- 
on the rest of mankind. They see all around them con- 
founded with faction and party rage, without the least 
remorse or compassion. The widow's tears, the orphan's 
cries, and the sighs of despair itself cannot affect them. 
Like the Fisherman in the fable, they boldly pursue 
their sport, and only reply, it must be so, because we 
cannot live, as we would do, without it. What brutish, 
unsociable sentiments are these; such as a mere state 
of nature would scarce digest 1 Those that have any 
traces of equity in their brest, or any regard for th 
iigius of mankind, should enter their protest against 
such notions as these, and oppose the practice of them 
with all their might and strength. 



FAB. CLXXVL MERCURY and 




]\/TERCURY having a mind to know how much he 
* was esteemed among men, transformed himself 



JESOP'S FABLES. C97 

into the shape of one of them ; and going into a 
carver's shop, where little images were to be sold, he 
saw Jupiter, Juno, himself, and most of the other 
gods and goddesses. So, pretending that he wanted 
to buy, says he to the carver, What do you ask for 
this f and pointed to the figure of Jupiter. A groat 
says the other. And what for that? meaning Juno. 
I must have something more for that, says he. Well, 
and What's the price of this ? says Mercury, nodding 
his head at himself. Why, says the man, if you are iu 
earnest, and will buy the other two, I will throw you 
that into the bargain. 

THE APPLICATION. 

Nothing makes a man so cheap and little iatheeyes- 
of discerning people, as his enquiring after his own 
worth, and wanting to know \vhal value others set upon 
him. He that often busies himself in stating the account 
of his own merit, will probably employ his thoughts 
upon a very barren subject: those who are full of them- 
selves, being generally the emptiest fellows. Some are 
so vain as to hunt for praise, and lav traps for commen- 
dation ; which when they do, it is pity but they should 
meet with the same disappointment as Mercury in the 
fable. He that behaves himself as he should do, need 
not fear procuring a good share of respect, or raising a 
fair, flourishing reputation. These are the inseparable 
attendants of those that do well, and in course follow 
the man that acquits himseif handsomely. But then 
they should never be the end or motive of our pursuits: 
our principal aim should be the welfare and happiness 
of our country, our friends, and ourselves; and that 
should be directed by the rules of honour and virtue. 
As long as we do this, we need not be concerned what 
the world thinks of us: for a curiosity of that kind 
does but prevent what it most desires to obtain. Fame, 
in this respect, is like a whimsical mistress : she flies 
from those who pursue her most, and follows such as. 
sliovv the least regard to her. 

o a 



FABLES. 
FAB. CLXXVII. The THIEVES and the COCK. 




COME Thieve*, entering a house with a design to rob 
^it, when they were got in,' found nothing worth taking, 
but a Cock ! so they took and earned him off. But 
as they were about to kill him, he begged hard for his 
life, putting them in mind, how useful he was to man- 
kind, by crowing and calling them up betimes to their 
work. You villain, replied they, it is for that very rea- 
son we will wring your neck off; for you alarm and keep 
people waking, so that we cannot rob in quiet for you. 



The same thing vrhich recommends us to the esteem 
of good people, will make those that are bad have but 
an ill opinion of us. It is in vain for innocent men, 
under oppression, to complain to those who are the oc- 
casion of it; all they^fraa urge, -will but make against 
them; and even thc'ir very innocence, though they 
should say nothing, would render them sufficiently sus- 
pected. The advice, therefore, that this fable brings 
along with it, is to inform- us, that there is no trusting, 
nr,r any hopes of living well with wicked, unjust men. 
"When vice flourishes and is in power, were it possible 



AESOP'S FABLES. 299 

for a good man to live quietly in the neighbourhood of 
it, and preserve his integrity, it might be sometimes 
convenient for him to do so, rather than quarrel with, 
and provoke it against him. But as it is certain that 
rogues areirreconcileableenemiestomen of worth, if the 
latter would be secure, they must take a method to free 
themselves from the power and society of the former. 

FAB. CLXXVIil. The Fox and the Ass. 




::.;!:;:;;;;;,^^^!^: ^^rfSiii :; - 

AN Ass finding a Lion's shin, disguised himself 
-**- with it, and ranged about the forest, putting all the 
beasts that saw 7 him into a bodily fear. After he had 
diverted himself thus for some time, he met a Fox : 
and being desirous to fright him too, as well as the 
rest, he leapt at him with some fierceness, and endea- 
voured to imitate the roaring of the Lion. Your 
humble servant, says the Fox, if you had held your 
tongue, I might have taken you for a Lion, as others. 
did: but now you bray, I know who you are. 

THE APPLICATION. 

This is so trite and common a subject, that there is 
scarce any one who is ignorant of it. A man is known 
by his words, as a tree is by the fruit; and if we would 
be apprized of the nature and qualities of any one, let 



300 



7ESOFS FABLES. 



him but discourse, and he himself will speak them to 
us, better than another can describe them. We mav 
therefore perceive from this fable, ho\v proper it is for 
those to hold their tongues, who would not discover the 
shallowness of their understandings. 

.Asses and Owls, unseen, themselves betray, 
When these attempt to hoot, or those to bray. GARTH. 
The deepest rivers are most silent; the greatest noise 
is ever found where, there is the least depth of water. 
And it is a true observation, that those who are" the 
weakest in understanding and most slow of apprehen- 
sion, are generally the strongest in opinion, and most 
precipitate in uttering their crude conception?. When, 
with a secret awe, we regard the grave dress and im- 
portant mien of some senatorial! person, whom we have 
chanced to meet in a cottee-house, what a speaker do 
we often think he must be before we. hear him speak ! 
His air breathes the seriousness of a privy counsellor, 
and his erect aspect the dignity of an eminent patriot: 
hut he utters himself, and undeceives us; he brays, and 
tells the whole company what he is. 

FAB. CLXXIX. The HEN and the SWALLOW. 




HEN finding some Serpents eggs in a dung- 
hill, sat upon them, with a design to hatcb 



,ESOP'S FABLES. 301 

them. A swallow perceiving it, flew towards her, 
and with some warmth and passion : Are you mad, 
says she, to sit hovering over a brood of such perni- 
cious creatures, as you do ? Be assured, the moment 
you bring them to light, you are the first they will 
attack, and wreak their venomous spite upon. 

THE APPLICATION. 

This fable is only to put us in mind, once more, of 
what we have already, more than once, met with in the 
course of these fables, that we should never have any 
thrng to do with ill men : no, not even to do them kind- 
nesses. Men of ill principles are a generation of vi- 
pers, that ought to be crushed under our feet, and de- 
stroyed the first opportunity. Every rogue should be 
look upon by honest men as a poisonous serpent. It 
is not suificient that they avoid and keep clear of him ; 
but, if they have any value for their own safety, they 
should prosecute and maul him, and render him incapa- 
ble of ever doing mischief. The man who is occasionally 
or by accident, one's enemy, may be mollified by kind- 
nes.s and reclaimed by good usage : such a behaviour, 
reason and morality both expect from us. But *-e 
should ever resolve, if not to suppress, at least to have 
no dealings with those, whose blood is tinctured with 
hereditary, habitual villany, and their nature leavened 
with evil, to jsuch a degree, as to be incapable of a re- 
formation. 



302 



/ESOP'S FABLES. 



FAB. CLXXX. The DOG invited to SUPPBK. 




A GENTLEMAN having invited an extraordinary 
** friend to sup with him, ordered a handsome 
entertainment to be prepared. His Dog;, observing 
this, thought with himself, that now would be a good 
opportunity for him to invite another Dog, a friend 
of his, to partake of the good cheer. Accordingly, he 
did so ; and the strange Dog was conducted into the 
kitchen, where he saw mighty preparations going for- 
ward. Thought he to himself, this is rare! I shall 
fiii my belly charmingly by and by, with some of these 
dainties ! I'll eat enough to last me a week : Oh, how 
nicely and deliciously shall I feed ! While he stood and 
thought thus with himself, his tail wagged, and hi& 
chops watered exceedingly; and this drew the obser- 
vation of the cook towards him; who, seeing a strange 
cur with his eyes intent upon the victuals, stole soft- 
ly behind him, and taking him up by the two hind; 
legs, threw him out of a window into the street. The 



AESOP'S FABLES. 306 

hard stones gave him a very severe receptioa, and he 
was almost stunned with the fall; but recovering him- 
self, he ran yelping and crying half the length of a 
street; the noise of \vhich brought several other dogs 
about him ; who, knowing of the invitation, began to 
enquire how he had fared ? O, says he, admirably 
well ; I never \vas better entertained in my life : but, 
in troth, we drank a little too hard; for my part, I 
was so overtaken, that 1 scarce know which way I 
got out of the house. 

THE APPLICATION. 

There is no depending upon a second-hand interest: 
unless we know ourselves to be well with the principal, 
and are assured of his favour and protection, we stand 
but upon a slippery foundation. They are strangers to 
the world, who are so vain as to think they can be well 
xvith any one by proxy ; they may, by this means, be 
cajoled, bubbled, and imposed upon, but are under great 
uncertainty as to gaining their point, and may proba- 
bly be treated with scorn and derision in the end. Yet 
there are not wanting, among the several species of 
fops, silly people of this sort, who pride themselves in 
an imaginary happine>s, from being in the good graces 
of a great man's friend's friend. Alas! the great men 
themselves are but' too apt to deceive and fail in mak- 
ing good their promises; how then can we expect any 
good from those who do but promise and vow in their 
names! To place a confidence in such sparks, is indeed 
so false a reliance, that we should be ashamed to be de- 
tected in it; and, like the cur in the fable, rather own 
we had been well treated, than let the world see how 
justly we had been punished for our ridiculous credu- 
lily. 



304 



,SOPS FABLES, 

JUPITER and the HERDSMAN. 




A HERDSMAN, missing a young heifer that belong- 
ed to his herd, went up and down the forest to 
seek it. And having walked a great deal of ground 
to no purpose, he fell a praying to Jupiter for relief; 
promising to sacrifice a kid to him, if he would help 
him to a discovery of the thief. After this, he went 
n a little farther, and came near a grove of oaks, 
where he found the carcase of his heifer, and a lion 
grumbling over it, and feeding upon it. The sight 
almost seared him out of his wits; so down he fell 
upon his knees once more, and addressing himself to 
Jupiter; O Jupiter! says he, I promised thee a kid to 
show me the thief, but now I promise thee a bull, if 
thou wilt be so merciful as to deliver me out of his 
clutches. 

THE APPLICATION. 

How ignorant and stupid are some people, who form 
their notions of the Supreme Being from their own poor 
shallow conceptions; and then, like f reward children 
with their nurses, think it consistent with infinite wis- 
dom, and unerring justice, to comply with all their 
whimsical petitions, Let men but live as justly as they: 



AESOP'S FABLES. 



305 



can, and just Providence will give them what they ought 
to have. Of all the involuntary sins which men com- 
mit, scarce any are more frequent, than that of their 
praying absurdly and improperly, as well as unseason- 
ably, when i heir time might have been em ployed so much 
belter. The many private collections sold up a-ul down 
the nation, do not a little contribute to this injudicious 
practice; which is the more to be condemned, in that 
we have so incomparable a public liturgy ; one single 
address whereof (except the Lord's prayer) may be pro- 
nounced to be the best that ever was compiled ; and 
alone preferable to all the various manuals of occasion- 
al devotion, which are vended bv hawkers and pedlars 
about our streets. It is as follows. 

"Almighty God, the fountain of all wisdom, who know* 
est our necessities before we ask, and our ignorance in 
asking ; we be>eech thee to have compassion upon our 
infirmities; and those things which to* our unworthi- 
ness we dare not, and for our blindness we cannot ask, 
vouchsafe to give us, for the worthiness of thy Son Je- 
sus Christ our Lord." 

FAB. CLXXXII. The FIGHTING COCKS. 




Cocks were lighting for the sovereignty of 
the tlunghiUf And ouo of them having got the 



306 JESOFS FABLES. 

better of the other, he that was vanquished crept into 
a hole, and hid himself for some time ; but the victor 
flew up to an eminent place, clapt his wings, and 
crowed out Victory. An Eagle who was watching for 
his prey near the place, saw him, and making a stoop, 
trussed him in his tulons, and carried him oft'. The 
cock that had been beaten, perceiving this, soon quit- 
ted his hole, and shaking off all remembrance of his 
late disgrace, gallanted the hens with all the intrepi- 
dity imaginable. 

THE APPLICATION, 

Tin's fable shows the impropriety and inconvenience 
of running into extremes. Much of our happiness de- 
pends upon keeping an even balance in our words and 
actions; in not suffering the scale of our reason to 
mount us too high in time of prosperity, nor to sink us 
too low xvith the weight of adverse fortune. 

It is a question, Which shows people in the most 
contemptible light, exulting immoderately upon a fresh 
accession of good, or being too abjectly cast down at 
the sudden approach of evil ? We are apt to form our 
notions of the man from the stability of his temper, in 
this respect, and account him a brave or a wise man, 
according to the proportion of equanimity which he 
exerts upon any change of his condition. But though 
our reputation were no ways concerned in the case, 
and a man were not to be reckoned a coxcomb for be- 
ing elated, or a coward for being dejected with the vi- 
cissitudes of life, yet the true regard of our own pri- 
vate satisfaction should incline us to play the philoso- 
pher, and learn to keep our spirits calm and even ; be- 
cause life would be a labyrinth of perplexities without 
it. One sudden turn would come so thick upon, the 
back of another, that we should be bewildered in the 
quick succession of joys and terrors, without having so 
much as a quiet moment to ourselves. 



.SOPS FABLES. 

FAB. CLXXXIII. 

The YOUNG MEN and the COOK. 




HPWO young Men went into a Cook's-shop, under 
-- pretence of buying meat; and while the Cook's 
back was turned, one of them snatched up a piece of 
beef, and gave it to his companion, who presently 
clapt it under his cloak. The Cook, turning about 
again, and missing his beef, began to charge them 
with it; upon which he that first took it swore bit- 
terly he had none of it. He that had it swore as 
heartily that he had taken up none of his meat. Why, 
look ye, gentlemen, says the Cook, I see your equivo- 
cation ; and though I cannot tell which of you has 
taken my meat, I am sure between you both, there 
is a thief, and a couple of rascals. 

THE APPLICATION. 

An honest man's word is as good as his oath " 9 and 
80 is a rogue's too ; for he that will cheat and lye, why 
should he scruple to forswear himself? Is the latter 
more criminal than either of the former? An honest 
man needs no oath to oblige him ; and a rogue only 
deceives you the more certainly by it; because you 
think you ha?e tied him up, and he is sure you have 



.108 ^SOP'S FABLES. 

not. In truth, it is not easy with the eye of reason, to 
discern that there is any good in shearing at all. We 
need not scruple to take an honest man's bare asseve- 
ration ; and \ve shall do wrong if we believe a rogue, 
though he swear* by the most solemn oaths that can be 
invented. There are, besides, a sort of people who are 
rognes, and yet do not know that they are such ; who, 
when they have taken an oath, make a"scrup!e of break- 
ing it; but rack their invention to evade it by some 
equivocation or other; by which, if they can but satis- 
fy their acquaintance, and serve their own scheme, they 
think all is well, and never once consider the black and 
heinous guilt which must attend such a behaviour. 
They solemnly call the Supreme Being to witness; to 
what ? To a sham, an evasion, a lye. Thus these unthink- 
ing prevaricating wretches, at the same time that they 
believe there is a God, act as if there were none ; or, 
what is worse, dare affront him in the highest degree! 
They, who by swearing would clear themselves of a 
crime of which they are really guilty, need not be at 
much pains about wording their oath ;*for, express them- 
selves how they will, they are sure to be forsworn. 

V. The JACKDAW and the SHEEP. 



II1FT 



111 




JACKDAW sat chattering upon the back of a 
L sheep. Peace, you noisy thing, says the sheep; 



/BSOP'S FABLES; 



SCK) 



if I were a dog', you durst not serve me so. That is 
true enough, replies the J ackdaw, 1 know very well who 
1 have to do with; 1 never middle with the surly and 
revengeful : but I love to plague such poor helpless 
creatures as you are that cannot do means harm again. 

THE APPLICATION. 

Many people in the world are of the temper of this 
Jackdaw in the fable, who do mi^chier lor mischief's 
sake ; and, at the same time, are never so well pleated, 
ao; when they do it to the innocent and undeserving. 
They love themselves too well to otier an injury to ono 
of their own malicious principles, for tear of a suitable 
return; but desire no better grounds, at any time, for 
being hurtful, than the prospect of being so with im- 
punity. How inconsistent arevsuch proceedings as these- 
with honour and generosity ! How opposite to the cha- 
racter of a great and good man ! and how directly con- 
trary to the rules prescribed for the behaviour of noble 
and heroic spirits. 

The PLOWMAN and FORTUNE 




TIE Plowman, as he was plowing the ground, 
found a treasure. Transported with joy he, 



310 ^SOP'S FABLES. 

immediately began to return thanks to the ground, 
\vhich had been so liberal and kind to him. Fortune 
observed what he did, and could not forbear discover- 
ing her resentment of it. She instantly appeared to 
him, and, You fool, says she, what a blockhead are 
you to lie thanking the ground thus, and take no no- 
tice of me ! You sot, you ; if you had lost such a trea- 
sure, instead of finding it, I should have been the first 
yon would have laid the blame upon. 

THE APPLICATION. 

If our affairs succeed and go well, we ought to let 
them have the credit of it, to whose interest it is chiefly 
owing, and whom upon any miscarriage, or ill manage- 
ment, we should have found fault with. That just rule 
of equity, to do as we would be done unto, should, as 
near as we can, be observed in every action of our 
lives. But vanity and peevishness dispose us too often 
to break it; one makes us ascribe that to our own good 
address, which perhaps is owing to some accident; the 
other puts us upon charging Fortune, or somebody be- 
sides ourselves, with that ill success, for which we may 
probably be indebted to our own stupidity and negli- 
gence only. Wkat titles of honour, what stations of 
dignity, what places of profit in church and state, are 
now and then possessed by dull, useless wretches ! who 
never once dreamt that they were obliged to Fortune 
alone for their happines in obtaining them ! Yet, if 
the case were quite otherwise, and these creatures left 
low and undistinguished as their own merit, it is ten to 
one but they would have cursed their stars, fretted at 
their ill luck, and stormed at the barbarous treatment 
of their capricious fortune. 



/KSOP'S FABLES. 

FAB. CLXXXVI. 
The APE and her trco YOUNG ONES. 



311 




AN Ape having two young ones, was doatingly 
** fond of one, but disregarded and slighted the 
other. One day she chanced to be surprised by the 
hunters, and had much ado to get off. However, she 
did not forget her favourite young one, which she 
took up in her arms, that it might be the more secure : 
the other, which she neglected, by natural instinct, 
leapt upon her back, and so away they scampered to- 
gether. But it unluckily fell out, that the dam, iir 
her precipitate flight, blinded with haste, dashed her 
favourite's head against a stone, and killed it. The 
hated one, clinging close to her rough -back, escaped 
all the danger of the pursuit. 

THE APPLICATION. 

This fable is designed to expose ihe folly of some 
parents, wfio by indulging and humouring their fa- 
vourite children, spoil and ruin them ; while those, of 
whom they have been the least fond, have done very 
well. The child that knows it can command its pa- 
rent's affections, will hardly be brought to know how 
to obey. The fondness of indiscreet parents to fa- 



S FABLES. 

vourite children is blind as love itself; they are so far 
from seeing any blemishes or imperfections in them, 
that their very deformity is beauty, and all their uglv 
tricks graces. Thus, without ever being checked and 
corrected tor their faults, but rather applauded and ca- 
ressed for them, when they come abroad upon the theatre 
of the world, what rock will they not split upon ? While 
the child who is so happy as to escape these very ten- 
der regards, these pernicious indulgencies, is obliged 
to be good and honest in its own defence. The parent v 
looks upon it with an eye clear from the mists of fond- 
ness. Me has no regard to its dislike or approbation ; 
but, for his own credit, puts it into such a \vay of edu- 
cation as reason dictates ; and forces it to be accom- 
plished, as its capacity will admit. 

PAD. CLXXXV1I. 

The SHEPHERD turned MERCHANT. 




A SHEPHERD that kept his sheep near the sea, one 
" clear summer's day, drove them close to the 
shore, and sat down upon a piece of a rock to enjoy 
the cool breeze that came from the water. The 
green clement appeared calm and smooth ; and The- 
tis, with her train of smiliug beautiful nymphs, seemed 



FABLES. 315 

to dance upon the floating surface of the deep. The 
shepherd's heart thrilled with secret pleasure, and he 
began to wish for the life of a merchant. O how 
happy, says he, should I be, to plow this liquid plain, 
in a pretty tight vessel of my own ! and to visit the 
remote parts of the world, instead of sitting idly here, 
to look upon a parcel of senseless sheep, while they 
are grazing ! Then what ample returns should I make 
in the way of traffick, and what a short and certain 
path would this be to riches and honour! In short, 
this thought was improved into a resolution ; away 
he posted with ail expedition, sold his flock, and all 
that he had; then he bought a bark, and fitted it out 
for a voyage; he loaded it with a cargo of dates, and 
set sail for a mart that was held upon the coast of 
Asia, five hundred leagues off. He had not long been 
at sea, before the wind began to blow tempestuously, 
and the waves to rage and swell ; the violence of the 
weather increased upon him, his ship was in danger 
of sinking, and he was obliged to lighten her, by 
throwing all his dates overboard : after this, his vessel 
was driven upon a rock near the shore, and split to 
pieces ; he himself hardly escaping with life* Poor, 
and destitute of subsistence, he applied himself to the 
man who had bought his tiock, and was admitted to 
tend it as a hireling. He sat in the same place as 
before, and the ocean again looked calm and smooth. 
Ah ! says he, deceitful, tempting element, in vain you 
try to engage me a second time ; my misfortunes 
have left me too poor to be again deluded the same 
way ; and experience has made me so wise as to re- 
solve, whatever my condition may be, never to trust 
to thy faithless bosom more. 

THE APPLICATION. 

Bought wit is the best : and the more variety of dis- 
appointments we meet vyith^ the greater will be our ex- 
P 



314 >SOPS FABLES. 

perience,and the better we shall be qualified to rub thro* 
the world. Mankind has a strange propensity for things 
that are new and untried : and so strong a bias inclines 
them to shifting and changing, that every one disre- 
lishes hisown profession, and wishes he had been of some 
other employment. The young academic, designed to 
the most grave of all professions, hates to think of his 
peculiar habit, of that formal, reserved deportment by 
which he is to separate himself from what he counts the 
pleasures of the world, and bid adieu to that irregula- 
rity which youth so much delights in. He longs for a 
commission in the army, that he may be fashionably li- 
centious, and indulge himself unquestioned in the wan- 
ton sallies of a brisk youthful appetite. In the mean 
time, the old soldier, harassed out with laborious cam- 
paigns abroad, and vexed with the slow returns of his 
half-pay at home, repines at the happy condition of the 
ecclesiastic, battening in ease and plenty, and sleeping 
unmolested in one of the upper stalls of a cathedral. 
With remorse he calls to mind his former perverseness 
in quitting a college life, and defeating the purpose of 
his relations, who had purchased the next reversion of 
a fat benefice for him. He shakes his head, and re- 
flects, that, if it had not been for his folly, instead of 
aching limbs, and an empty purse, he might have 
enjoyed as much leisure and luxury as any priest in 
the land. 

Thus, sometimes with, sometimes without, reason, we 
are disgusted at our station, and even those who are 
embarked in another way ; which, however it may seem 
to be a misfortune entailed upon us, yet carries this ad- 
vantage with it, that, as we are almost sure of being 
disappointed by a change, we are as certain likewise 
of gaining some experience by the bargain, and being 
wiser for the future. 
